I once wrote a little "name generator" program in Microsoft Basic for the Dragon computer which randomly put together (theoretically) pronouncable syllables, thus creating names.
I once wrote a little "name generator" program in Microsoft Basic for the Dragon computer which randomly put together (theoretically) pronounceable syllables, thus creating names.

A few weeks later I modded it to alter the amount sand in the hour glass, color etc.
A few weeks later I modded it to alter the amount of sand in the hour glass, color etc.

Every now and then I revist the code and have been 'tweaking' this little toy ever since.
Every now and then I revisit the code and have been 'tweaking' this little toy ever since.

When you have more experience and debug-hours you'll find your self answering more questions.
When you have more experience and debug-hours you'll find yourself answering more questions.

I doubt this very much. Its nice, has some beautiful multi threading features etc. etc. but its been around for a number of years now and hasnt made much impact outside its telecom niche.
I doubt this very much. It's nice, has some beautiful multithreading features etc. etc. but it's been around for a number of years now and hasn't made much impact outside its telecom niche.

I think one of the major handicaps for any new language is the sheer nulber of libraries the encumbant languages have.
I think one of the major handicaps for any new language is the sheer number of libraries the incumbent languages have.

in PERL this just involves glueing three libraries together with some simple code
in PERL this just involves gluing three libraries together with some simple code

Given that human cultures have small values differences between them, on a universal scale, you can't say that CEV implemented by Eliezer would be noticably better than a kind of CEV implemented by Attila the Hun, that incorporated only the values of Mongols.
Given that human cultures have small values differences between them, on a universal scale, you can't say that CEV implemented by Eliezer would be noticeably better than a kind of CEV implemented by Attila the Hun, that incorporated only the values of Mongols.

If I miss understood the persons post fine I retract my comment.
If I misunderstood the person's post fine I retract my comment.

The shared copy is ten preferable marked copy-on-write.
The shared copy is then preferably marked copy-on-write.

Computer Science pornography, the set is nothing more than trophies for elitest programmers who wish to show of.
Computer Science pornography, the set is nothing more than trophies for elitist programmers who wish to show off.

Question: if he goes to prison could he share a cell with former GOP Gov. Ryan, jsut to show Americans that Democrats and Republicans can live together in peace?
Question: if he goes to prison could he share a cell with former GOP Gov. Ryan, just to show Americans that Democrats and Republicans can live together in peace?

I have a sever inability to make big choices such as this, and I have cryocrastinated for quite some time.
I have a severe inability to make big choices such as this, and I have cryocrastinated for quite some time.

High status has been something sort after because it gets you better mates and more of them (perhaps illicitly).
High status has been something sought after because it gets you better mates and more of them (perhaps illicitly).

This triggers an abandonment reaction, like your buying a one-way-ticket to a distant land from which you could never return.
This triggers an abandonment reaction, like you're buying a one-way-ticket to a distant land from which you could never return.

If (2) is right then why isn't their hatred towards people who use astrology to make important decisions?
If (2) is right then why isn't there hatred towards people who use astrology to make important decisions?

Or show an bonus exhumed corpse at a funeral.
Or show a bonus exhumed corpse at a funeral.

Given that I always hear of it in the context of personal cryonics, where somebody is looking to preserve there own head, rather than something with any social benefit angle, that reinforces the impression of rudeness.
Given that I always hear of it in the context of personal cryonics, where somebody is looking to preserve their own head, rather than something with any social benefit angle, that reinforces the impression of rudeness.

Most people have already invested in a back up immortality plan, it's called religion.
Most people have already invested in a backup immortality plan, it's called religion.

Choosing a between a spouse an cryonics would be a dicey choice, where a spouse taking a strong stand could exert influence over something important, so the choice communicates a lot.
Choosing between a spouse and cryonics would be a dicey choice, where a spouse taking a strong stand could exert influence over something important, so the choice communicates a lot.

I wonder if the effect is muted in couple with children.
I wonder if the effect is muted in couples with children.

James, people use use astrology strongly for important decisions are treated differently from people who use it to break ties on little decisions.
James, people who use astrology strongly for important decisions are treated differently from people who use it to break ties on little decisions.

in fact, there is an overall lack of support for disorderly shutdowns; specifically addDeadManSwitch as existant in DeadRunner needs to be made available for use in this case
in fact, there is an overall lack of support for disorderly shutdowns; specifically addDeadManSwitch as existent in DeadRunner needs to be made available for use in this case

I bow to your nerdness, for sure, and I am all abored for neat future stuff, but in this arena, honestly, is enough enough already?
I bow to your nerdness, for sure, and I am all aboard for neat future stuff, but in this arena, honestly, is enough enough already?

First, we went through transition from begin...end to {...} and it porbably wasn't as painful for conservative folks as it is now when going from {...} to indentaion.
First, we went through transition from begin...end to {...} and it probably wasn't as painful for conservative folks as it is now when going from {...} to indentation.

I recieved my DSL and the color is really nice
I received my DSL and the color is really nice

Shortly afterward, Garrigan discovers that the desperate Kay decided to seek out a primative abortion herself in a nearby village, where she was caught, tortured, and executed by Amin's forces.
Shortly afterward, Garrigan discovers that the desperate Kay decided to seek out a primitive abortion herself in a nearby village, where she was caught, tortured, and executed by Amin's forces.

In a gruelling scene, Amin's henchmen pierce Garrigans chest with meat hooks and string him up while Amin looks on.
In a grueling scene, Amin's henchmen pierce Garrigan's chest with meat hooks and string him up while Amin looks on.

Can you imagine Tyler giving himself up to be killed for his writings because other Tylers exist in an vast universe, because of the abstract possibility of being tortured in a foreign land, or because saving his live would be a selfish "big thought"?
Can you imagine Tyler giving himself up to be killed for his writings because other Tylers exist in a vast universe, because of the abstract possibility of being tortured in a foreign land, or because saving his life would be a selfish "big thought"?

Somewhere else in the book, he talks about trying to prove a one of the contradictions (of naive set theory) in one of the axiomatic systems presumed to be consistent, and seeing what truths are revealed as the exploded bits of proof spontaneously reassemble.
Somewhere else in the book, he talks about trying to prove one of the contradictions (of naive set theory) in one of the axiomatic systems presumed to be consistent, and seeing what truths are revealed as the exploded bits of proof spontaneously reassemble.

While in practice economics is full of folks promoting various sides, one of the reasons I am proud to be an economist is that we have a good standard neutral analysis criteria, economic welfare, for judging policies, and we have developed a large literature full of techniques for applying this criteria to specific situations.
While in practice economics is full of folks promoting various sides, one of the reasons I am proud to be an economist is that we have a good standard neutral analysis criterion, economic welfare, for judging policies, and we have developed a large literature full of techniques for applying this criterion to specific situations.

It's would be a huge gesture of tremendous symbolic import, yes, but it's not just possible, it's useful.
It would be a huge gesture of tremendous symbolic import, yes, but it's not just possible, it's useful.

There is no viable opposition to the socially destructive power of those with large sums of money, extensive networks of economic and social controls, and no morals higher than the pits of hell except the institutions of government directed to helping those in need and the nation as whole so as to make great need less common and funded adequately for the job.
There is no viable opposition to the socially destructive power of those with large sums of money, extensive networks of economic and social controls, and no morals higher than the pits of hell except the institutions of government directed to helping those in need and the nation as a whole so as to make great need less common and funded adequately for the job.

In an idle moment, I e-mailed one of my correspondents back and said that I have never read Revelations, since I am an athiest.
In an idle moment, I e-mailed one of my correspondents back and said that I have never read Revelations, since I am an atheist.

in time-varying required expected returns do to changing risk premia;
in time-varying required expected returns due to changing risk premia;

Just because you yourself don't believe that there's 'anything wrong with that' doesn't mean that other people won't: especially on the internet, people can be viscous.
Just because you yourself don't believe that there's 'anything wrong with that' doesn't mean that other people won't: especially on the internet, people can be vicious.

Most startup founders think that their products are the greatest thing since sliced bread, but they're often also aware that they are biassed.
Most startup founders think that their products are the greatest thing since sliced bread, but they're often also aware that they are biased.

Its like throwing out the projector because they figure that now that they have the image on the wall, who needs it?
It's like throwing out the projector because they figure that now that they have the image on the wall, who needs it?

Good luck in your next endevour, George.
Good luck in your next endeavor, George.

If I was a CS professor, I would have sophmores make a clone of it for a 2-week project.
If I was a CS professor, I would have sophomores make a clone of it for a 2-week project.

The second is not as obvious and is the real issue with regards to privacy "how do we ensure acurate traceability of access".
The second is not as obvious and is the real issue with regards to privacy "how do we ensure accurate traceability of access".

Each person gets issed with one and it appears that the default password is their birthday (which obviously is easy to find when you have access as it is one of several secondry keys used to find individuals records).
Each person gets issued with one and it appears that the default password is their birthday (which obviously is easy to find when you have access as it is one of several secondary keys used to find individuals' records).

For instance it appears that users workstations are not sufficiently protected from maleware and other rouge software therefor it would be possible for an adversary to inject requests into the system under the ID of a person logged on at that workstation.
For instance it appears that users' workstations are not sufficiently protected from malware and other rogue software therefore it would be possible for an adversary to inject requests into the system under the ID of a person logged on at that workstation.

Assume if is possible for 1) 2 rational agents to have different information sets 2) an information set that partially specifies another individuals information set and utility function
Assume it is possible for 1) 2 rational agents to have different information sets 2) an information set that partially specifies another individual's information set and utility function

A big restriction on the size of an individuals information set is the time required to gather new information.
A big restriction on the size of an individual's information set is the time required to gather new information.

You checked that journal because even of curiosity kills the cat it is still intense enough to make you investigate. 
You checked that journal because even if curiosity kills the cat it is still intense enough to make you investigate. 

My brian is already trying to construct the rest of the poem around it.
My brain is already trying to construct the rest of the poem around it.

im more prone to getting the weird metal songs with no lyrics,that i hear just befor i wake up,and usually forget most of as soon as im awake then the bits of phrases...
i'm more prone to getting the weird metal songs with no lyrics,that i hear just before i wake up,and usually forget most of as soon as i'm awake then the bits of phrases...

(including yellng loudly at me about some pretty irrelevant b.s.)
(including yelling loudly at me about some pretty irrelevant b.s.)

Good play involves fairly sophisticated analysis, strategy and tactics, which maintains intetrest... but is beside the point I want to make.
Good play involves fairly sophisticated analysis, strategy and tactics, which maintains interest... but is beside the point I want to make.

For a non-trivial number of people, playing WoW for a couple of hours a day is more fun that playing real life.
For a non-trivial number of people, playing WoW for a couple of hours a day is more fun than playing real life.

AI's definetly should not do everything for us.
AI's definitely should not do everything for us.

A friendly future is a nice place to live in and not a place wher an AI does the living for us so we might as well just curl up in a fetal position and die.
A friendly future is a nice place to live in and not a place where an AI does the living for us so we might as well just curl up in a fetal position and die.

A coherenet "arts policy" ought to have improving the quality of movie dialogue among its goals.
A coherent "arts policy" ought to have improving the quality of movie dialogue among its goals.

iPhone is by far the best phone i've ever had, havent tried googles but, how hard can it be, if you know C / C++ Objective C is juts a new dialect and you program against an API which probably is well documented by apple..
iPhone is by far the best phone i've ever had, haven't tried google's but, how hard can it be, if you know C / C++ Objective C is just a new dialect and you program against an API which probably is well documented by apple..

If you're interested in making money off a particular application a different ansewr might be appropriate.
If you're interested in making money off a particular application a different answer might be appropriate.

I am not sure if this qualifies as technical, but the hardest problem I solved was to create an image of coffee sediments that can be cylindracally mapped around a cup.
I am not sure if this qualifies as technical, but the hardest problem I solved was to create an image of coffee sediments that can be cylindrically mapped around a cup.

What we came to determine in talking to each other, our first "serious" applications where things that were related to hobbies or interests.
What we came to determine in talking to each other, our first "serious" applications were things that were related to hobbies or interests.

Gothic, neo-colonialist, poetry reading fetsihists.  People whowrite in lisp are over arrogant dark harted people siting in theirbasements writing out "The world's most beautiful and complex closure"just waiting for the next chance they get to tell some one that asksfor help with the syntax of their .emacsrc, "If you don't know I amnot telling".  They all listen to really bad neo-synth pop fromgermany too.
Gothic, neo-colonialist, poetry reading fetishists.  People who write in lisp are over arrogant dark hearted people siting in their basements writing out "The world's most beautiful and complex closure"just waiting for the next chance they get to tell someone that asks for help with the syntax of their .emacsrc, "If you don't know I am not telling".  They all listen to really bad neo-synth pop from germany too.

Very few people understand what this language is doing and its probably a secret cult, but you are pretty sure you could controll the world if you could just figure out how to use it.
Very few people understand what this language is doing and it's probably a secret cult, but you are pretty sure you could control the world if you could just figure out how to use it.

When there is an error onthere linux laptop they sometimes just go look at the source instead of searching for the error online.
When there is an error on their linux laptop they sometimes just go look at the source instead of searching for the error online.

It doesn't exactly taste good (at first, anyway), but it's manly (the bragging rights that come with low-level programming) and it get's the job done.
It doesn't exactly taste good (at first, anyway), but it's manly (the bragging rights that come with low-level programming) and it gets the job done.

It's electric blue, comes in a huge cup with peices of fruit and an umbrella in it.
It's electric blue, comes in a huge cup with pieces of fruit and an umbrella in it.

I'll consider Import beer being the US ones, since I live in EU :) and we ofcourse have the best beer in the world :)
I'll consider Import beer being the US ones, since I live in EU :) and we of course have the best beer in the world :)

My workplace (local government) is going online with it's jury selection system, and if you're selected, you can log in to a site and fill out the questionairre they normally give to you in the mail.
My workplace (local government) is going online with its jury selection system, and if you're selected, you can log in to a site and fill out the questionnaire they normally give to you in the mail.

A respondents answer to an open-ended question is coded into a response scale afterwards.
A respondent's answer to an open-ended question is coded into a response scale afterwards.

I realised years later that the app never deleted any data from the DB, so the longer they used it the slower it would get as the databse file got bigger and bigger.
I realised years later that the app never deleted any data from the DB, so the longer they used it the slower it would get as the database file got bigger and bigger.

What you are seeing here are the Behringer Eurorack Pro RX1602, the 16 channel line mixer that provides me a central place to control the volume of many of the workstatations while being able to hear all of them without having to go over the speakers.
What you are seeing here are the Behringer Eurorack Pro RX1602, the 16 channel line mixer that provides me a central place to control the volume of many of the workstations while being able to hear all of them without having to go over the speakers.

But its pretty.
But it's pretty.

Helium and Halon are the primary systems used for every day work.
Helium and Halon are the primary systems used for everyday work.

The most valued tool in all this, as always, was Syngery, the network TCP/IP based "KVM switch".
The most valued tool in all this, as always, was Synergy, the network TCP/IP based "KVM switch".

I think what Jo is trying to hint at is that she would really like for people to argue at Strage Horizon instead of here.
I think what Jo is trying to hint at is that she would really like for people to argue at Strange Horizon instead of here.

I don't think my life would be an adventure of neverending excitement if I spent until the end of time trying to figure out the weird behaviors of slightly larger Tuing machines.
I don't think my life would be an adventure of neverending excitement if I spent until the end of time trying to figure out the weird behaviors of slightly larger Turing machines.

I'm more horrified by the prospect of spending eternity proving theorems that don't make my life one bit easier, like Sysiphus.
I'm more horrified by the prospect of spending eternity proving theorems that don't make my life one bit easier, like Sisyphus.

But he cautions that "[simple] linear calculations, of couxe, can only be very rough approximations."
But he cautions that "[simple] linear calculations, of course, can only be very rough approximations."

It would certsinly be disgusting to look at someone else turning into something like that - it is too similar to people who are horribly maimed.
It would certainly be disgusting to look at someone else turning into something like that - it is too similar to people who are horribly maimed.

But although orgasmium is defenselsess, it is guarded by a benevolent god.
But although orgasmium is defenseless, it is guarded by a benevolent god.

So you solve all problems of of the class that X is in.
So you solve all problems of the class that X is in.

See, you've meet infinity times more women than me lately!
See, you've met infinity times more women than me lately!

My pride and job was a program that allowed me to plug in an XBox controller, fly a spaceship around in cornflower blue space, and shoot missles.
My pride and joy was a program that allowed me to plug in an XBox controller, fly a spaceship around in cornflower blue space, and shoot missiles.

I wrote some code generators to avoid repetiting tasks.
I wrote some code generators to avoid repeating tasks.

Well ... I got sick of writing basically teh same thing over and over with just different parameters etc.
Well ... I got sick of writing basically the same thing over and over with just different parameters etc.

Made my life alot easier.
Made my life a lot easier.

It gives the customer peice of mind that they can still hold out nearly 1/3rd of payment until the end
It gives the customer peace of mind that they can still hold out nearly 1/3rd of payment until the end

are you saying that at your 'Prototype - Completion' stage, you take the remaining 1/3 portion of the project cost before youve completed the clients work?
are you saying that at your 'Prototype - Completion' stage, you take the remaining 1/3 portion of the project cost before you've completed the client's work?

and then have the option to see a filtered text, that conatins only the sentences of one or more categories.
and then have the option to see a filtered text, that contains only the sentences of one or more categories.

But for the giga byte RAM eaters Dvlpmnt tools (TIBCO, etc.), you can develop whatever you need (unless my computing needs are really minima!)
But for the gigabyte RAM eaters Development tools (TIBCO, etc.), you can develop whatever you need (unless my computing needs are really minimal!)

OK, some versions have loops, but I remember have met some LISPers taht would shun you for thinking "iteration"
OK, some versions have loops, but I remember have met some LISPers that would shun you for thinking "iteration"

Lets start with the following:
Let's start with the following:

The fascist-history / gender-theory look a the Prussian military man's mindset is getting a little too abstract.
The fascist-history / gender-theory look at the Prussian military man's mindset is getting a little too abstract.

maybe the switch you're hitting has lost it's uplink. 
maybe the switch you're hitting has lost its uplink. 

will lolok
will look

So as you step from xenophobic to local to aws you encounter increasing constraints that must be accomodated.
So as you step from xenophobic to local to aws you encounter increasing constraints that must be accommodated.

So maybe I just have to start doiong that, an dfrom there figure out usability issues.
So maybe I just have to start doing that, and from there figure out usability issues.

and of courses ran out of oomph before it even had a UI to the version control system built in
and of course ran out of oomph before it even had a UI to the version control system built in

still sort of looking for a projec.
still sort of looking for a project.

ohwell, i was just reminding myself what it was like to chat at his house
oh well, i was just reminding myself what it was like to chat at his house

I should read some shakespere, then go to bed
I should read some shakespeare, then go to bed

eigth maids a-milking
eight maids a-milking

I'd put the parser on it own machine.
I'd put the parser on its own machine.

They took a mostly procedural, defuat global namespace PHP4 and via much clever work brought capital DP Design Patterns to the table.
They took a mostly procedural, default global namespace PHP4 and via much clever work brought capital DP Design Patterns to the table.

While PHP is interpreted rather than compiled, it's code quality can generally be judged by the same best practices found in many other procedural languages.
While PHP is interpreted rather than compiled, its code quality can generally be judged by the same best practices found in many other procedural languages.

If you're truly asking for PHP imparticular, PHP rookies make the following mistakes:
If you're truly asking for PHP in particular, PHP rookies make the following mistakes:

utilize include files with intermingled with display, data access, and business logic 
utilize include files intermingled with display, data access, and business logic 

Nowhere but the past, as a comforting bu inaccurate alternative answer.
Nowhere but the past, as a comforting but inaccurate alternative answer.

And I don't necessarily man cosmetics or breast augmentation surgery.
And I don't necessarily mean cosmetics or breast augmentation surgery.

Proper diet, basic hygeine, clean clothes, etc. etc.
Proper diet, basic hygiene, clean clothes, etc. etc.

Alot of items in the computer world are art based where you can easy make the case for a different correct way.
A lot of items in the computer world are art based where you can easily make the case for a different correct way.

In the long ago past, before every vendor stated doing certification, you had some organizations trying to do this and all thier tests came down to requiring you to use their authorized language(s) and being tested on usage and best practices for that language nothing of a generic test that would be required for a pass this or you cannot work.
In the long ago past, before every vendor started doing certification, you had some organizations trying to do this and all thier tests came down to requiring you to use their authorized language(s) and being tested on usage and best practices for that language nothing of a generic test that would be required for a pass this or you cannot work.

in your .emacs file then you can type C-x w h REGEX <RET> <RET> to highlight all occurances of REGEX, and C-x w r REGEX <RET> to unhighlight them again.
in your .emacs file then you can type C-x w h REGEX <RET> <RET> to highlight all occurrences of REGEX, and C-x w r REGEX <RET> to unhighlight them again.

The vocal cords will be eliminated by a process of evolution was was the tail of man when he came from the ape.
The vocal cords will be eliminated by a process of evolution as was the tail of man when he came from the ape.

A book whose punchline made be whimper with a curious admixture of claustophobia and agoraphobia.
A book whose punchline made me whimper with a curious admixture of claustophobia and agoraphobia.

What's the most disfunctional team of supposed good guys you could imagine being put together in the DCU?
What's the most dysfunctional team of supposed good guys you could imagine being put together in the DCU?

she may be slow, but she trys.
she may be slow, but she tries.

The morning FBI Special Agent Sam Hicks was shot, he was in the process of violently storming his way into a the Korbes' family home
The morning FBI Special Agent Sam Hicks was shot, he was in the process of violently storming his way into the Korbes' family home

I certainly don't think hat the lives are of equal value.
I certainly don't think that the lives are of equal value.

The task must be to destabalise and desacralise gender
The task must be to destabilize and desacralise gender

its not enough to talk abstractly of revolution as being the cure-all we must invest our faith in.
it's not enough to talk abstractly of revolution as being the cure-all we must invest our faith in.

On the same token, on duty officers/troopers should use common sense and professional courtesy when it appropriate.
On the same token, on duty officers/troopers should use common sense and professional courtesy when it's appropriate.

I can in contact with a vehicle that struck a fix object at 21st and Washington Circle NW Washington, D.C.
I came in contact with a vehicle that struck a fixed object at 21st and Washington Circle NW Washington, D.C.

The vehicle was an unmarked VSP vehicle occuppied by 4 VSP officer.
The vehicle was an unmarked VSP vehicle occupied by 4 VSP officer.

knowing what there fate would be if I’d taken a report I had them make a call
knowing what their fate would be if I’d taken a report I had them make a call

I figured it was up to them to explain to there supervisor the damage to the unmarked cruiser.
I figured it was up to them to explain to their supervisor the damage to the unmarked cruiser.

A month later I stoped a civilain vehicle driven by a off duty VSP trooper for a traffic violation,
A month later I stopped a civilian vehicle driven by an off duty VSP trooper for a traffic violation,

As far as our stupid cowboy hats go, even the hood is affraid of the HATS.
As far as our stupid cowboy hats go, even the hood is afraid of the HATS.

Now that the idiots comments have been addressed, if VA Troopers are writing other officers, on or off duty shame on them!
Now that the idiot's comments have been addressed, if VA Troopers are writing other officers, on or off duty shame on them!

Troopers all over the Nation are reveered as the best officers in their state, they should be paid as such.
Troopers all over the Nation are revered as the best officers in their state, they should be paid as such.

The only contact I had with VSP was being stopped for speeding something like 80 in 60 or something its been a few years now.
The only contact I had with VSP was being stopped for speeding something like 80 in 60 or something it's been a few years now.

Now on that same trip (enroute to visit family in Texas) I was stopped about 40 miles into Texas
Now on that same trip (en route to visit family in Texas) I was stopped about 40 miles into Texas

As for professional courtesey… I have worked for a PD and a S.O. and for all you out of town guys, not everyone in VA is into writing LEO’s…
As for professional courtesy… I have worked for a PD and a S.O. and for all you out of town guys, not everyone in VA is into writing LEO’s…

This wording of the recruitment instructions was chosen to be conductive to more "overconfident looking data"
This wording of the recruitment instructions was chosen to be conducive to more "overconfident looking data"

Simple / reusable CRUD in PHP (NO famework or big classes)
Simple / reusable CRUD in PHP (NO framework or big classes)

The results are presented in grid (think goolge results) and because of that, the user cannot possibly use more then 1000 results.
The results are presented in grid (think google results) and because of that, the user cannot possibly use more then 1000 results.

the tendency to persist in using a well developed vocabulary rather than a newwer, less developed one.
the tendency to persist in using a well developed vocabulary rather than a newer, less developed one.

having operations which are known to be acheivable in various ways
having operations which are known to be achievable in various ways

the solutions offered are much more complex and less reliant than just having a port occupied with a non-existant server, so I'd have to go with that one.
the solutions offered are much more complex and less reliant than just having a port occupied with a non-existent server, so I'd have to go with that one.

The absues and extremism of the last eight years began as a Bush administration initiative, but it culminated as something for which both political parties, our leading political and media institutions, and our citizenry generally bear collective responsibility.
The abuses and extremism of the last eight years began as a Bush administration initiative, but it culminated as something for which both political parties, our leading political and media institutions, and our citizenry generally bear collective responsibility.

He's abstained until today due to what he calls "a desire to avoid taking on a fraught and desperately importantly subject without feeling extremely confident about my own views on the subject."
He's abstained until today due to what he calls "a desire to avoid taking on a fraught and desperately important subject without feeling extremely confident about my own views on the subject."

By this, she means that she drive very quickly and efficiently, passing idiots like Alice and Bob who take forever to get anywhere.
By this, she means that she drives very quickly and efficiently, passing idiots like Alice and Bob who take forever to get anywhere.

The second everyone uses index funds the second the market complete stops being efficient.
The second everyone uses index funds the second the market completely stops being efficient.

Please go build tools with this data that make both twitter.comand yourself rich and famous.
Please go build tools with this data that make both twitter.com and yourself rich and famous.

The scrape has full metadata on users and releationships, and I've calculated pagerank for the users.
The scrape has full metadata on users and relationships, and I've calculated pagerank for the users.

If your are a parent, I especially encourage you to pick it up for your son or daughter, it could change their lives.
If you are a parent, I especially encourage you to pick it up for your son or daughter, it could change their lives.

Great parts of the book could be read by high school students but for some other parts is necesary to have at least and undergrad degree to be able to understand it.
Great parts of the book could be read by high school students but for some other parts it's necesary to have at least an undergrad degree to be able to understand it.

Since reading this book I have decided that a proper physics book is not simply a half-explained mathematical proof splattered on paper with accompanying problems that try to out-smart competing authours, but a good physics book is, like this one, about physics!
Since reading this book I have decided that a proper physics book is not simply a half-explained mathematical proof splattered on paper with accompanying problems that try to out-smart competing authors, but a good physics book is, like this one, about physics!

One has the feeling that one understands the first time in ones life the topics presented -- e. g. the cristalographic groups.
One has the feeling that one understands the first time in ones life the topics presented -- e. g. the crystallographic groups.

While the writing is concise, it is full of insightful observations, and numerous irresistable, yet deep, questions to ponder.
While the writing is concise, it is full of insightful observations, and numerous irresistible, yet deep, questions to ponder.

This type of thing may be fine if you're speaking to someone who knows the land--a professor of the subject maybe, but is flirting with confussion for a student. A 2 simpling because this might be a great book--once you know the subject.
This type of thing may be fine if you're speaking to someone who knows the land--a professor of the subject maybe, but is flirting with confusion for a student. A 2 simply because this might be a great book--once you know the subject.

The sentence seems to need it's own text section.
The sentence seems to need its own text section.

Shankar's Text lays everything out brilliantly buy hitting the mathmatics FIRST then going into the theory.
Shankar's Text lays everything out brilliantly buy hitting the mathematics FIRST then going into the theory.

I like to instantly find our whether I am correct when I work problems (which allows me to move forward at a more rapid rate) and such a workbook would fill that need.
I like to instantly find out whether I am correct when I work problems (which allows me to move forward at a more rapid rate) and such a workbook would fill that need.

freedom of representation is streesed throughout and used as an aid to understanding
freedom of representation is stressed throughout and used as an aid to understanding

Absurd, circular reasoning, uses the infamous "its trivial to show" argument when ever something is difficult.
Absurd, circular reasoning, uses the infamous "it's trivial to show" argument when ever something is difficult.

This book was specified for my 400 level quantum class, after hours of intense study, trying to sort threw Townsends circular reasoning and gross ommissions, i have reverted to using a multitude of other textbooks and keeping Townsend closed. 
This book was specified for my 400 level quantum class, after hours of intense study, trying to sort through Townsend's circular reasoning and gross omissions, i have reverted to using a multitude of other textbooks and keeping Townsend closed. 

I've been extremely skeptical of the idea of government aide to the commercial real estate industry.
I've been extremely skeptical of the idea of government aid to the commercial real estate industry.

I'm talking about fiscally responsible developers, on-time payors with pared down staffs, who wrongly believed that the TARP funds going to the major banks would be put into circulation in the credit markets for new loans and renewals, which are the life-blood of the real estate industry.
I'm talking about fiscally responsible developers, on-time payers with pared down staffs, who wrongly believed that the TARP funds going to the major banks would be put into circulation in the credit markets for new loans and renewals, which are the life-blood of the real estate industry.

Well, ofcourse method parameters would have to be changed to expect IFoo's also, but that wouldn't be a breaking change, would it?
Well, of course method parameters would have to be changed to expect IFoo's also, but that wouldn't be a breaking change, would it?

Another approach would be to create a seperate branch of the API and do option 3 there.
Another approach would be to create a separate branch of the API and do option 3 there.

The way science is supported in America is horribly biassed against idea generation — grant proposals must be all about idea testing.
The way science is supported in America is horribly biased against idea generation — grant proposals must be all about idea testing.

You can certainly make a whiter flour than a whole wheat flour just by shaking a bowl of it and the finer particles will fall and the courser particles will rise to the top. If you take fine sand and course sand and just shake, the fine will go one direction and the course sand will go another.
You can certainly make a whiter flour than a whole wheat flour just by shaking a bowl of it and the finer particles will fall and the coarser particles will rise to the top. If you take fine sand and coarse sand and just shake, the fine will go one direction and the coarse sand will go another.

This is not a good season for sightseeing in —- because of the cold whether.
This is not a good season for sightseeing in —- because of the cold weather.

I have a theory, so called “reciprocity” is related to high population desity, especially high immigrant population, without a stable common culture.
I have a theory, so called “reciprocity” is related to high population density, especially high immigrant population, without a stable common culture.

People focusing on other topics, such as war, environment, or AI, should help refine the market's estimates of how ems would effect those topics, and how they would effect ems.
People focusing on other topics, such as war, environment, or AI, should help refine the market's estimates of how ems would affect those topics, and how they would affect ems.

Anywayz i still remember this because that's the only time i failed in any lab exam.
Anyways i still remember this because that's the only time i failed in any lab exam.

Even the greatest phisophers promoted asking questions.
Even the greatest philosophers promoted asking questions.

But what your doing will work.
But what you're doing will work.

The GIS bit is the easy part, cleaning up every ones rubbish data is what takes all the effort.
The GIS bit is the easy part, cleaning up everyone's rubbish data is what takes all the effort.

for instance, ultramarathon bicycle races would have a device on the bike (or the crew car following the bike) and sponsers can follow the action online, rather than driving the route as the race progresses.
for instance, ultramarathon bicycle races would have a device on the bike (or the crew car following the bike) and sponsors can follow the action online, rather than driving the route as the race progresses.

I am hobbist GIS programmer.
I am hobbyist GIS programmer.

I have have a desktop application written in VB6 that uses Blue Marbles GeoView mapping component to build digital maps for locations using ESRI shape files and geotiffs.
I have a desktop application written in VB6 that uses Blue Marbles GeoView mapping component to build digital maps for locations using ESRI shape files and geotiffs.

Certanily there isn't a deterministic solution for it, but...
Certainly there isn't a deterministic solution for it, but...

Interesting analysis, though it became a hit outrageous at the end.
Interesting analysis, though it became a bit outrageous at the end.

Supposedly, this one man operation is netting millions of dollars of ad revenues--of this doesn't wreak of a Web 2.0 Madoff scheme, I don't know what does.
Supposedly, this one man operation is netting millions of dollars of ad revenues--if this doesn't reek of a Web 2.0 Madoff scheme, I don't know what does.

Markus doesn't actually know the clicks are fradulent.
Markus doesn't actually know the clicks are fraudulent.

They might have to think they were running some kind of simple, more mundane task... because, again, such a story would find it's way out if it got out to too many people.
They might have to think they were running some kind of simple, more mundane task... because, again, such a story would find its way out if it got out to too many people.

Under the guise of "testing" their click fraud conrols, Google unleashed millions, even billions, of tiny little bots out on the web, clicking away--little testers that could be divided up among all these PhDs and engingers so well that none of them would ever suspect a thing.
Under the guise of "testing" their click fraud controls, Google unleashed millions, even billions, of tiny little bots out on the web, clicking away--little testers that could be divided up among all these PhDs and engineers so well that none of them would ever suspect a thing.

What you have with Plenty of Fish is nothing short of monkeys typing Shakespeare--a site whose audience is mostly made up of incredibly intelligent--almost sensient--clickbots.
What you have with Plenty of Fish is nothing short of monkeys typing Shakespeare--a site whose audience is mostly made up of incredibly intelligent--almost sentient--clickbots.

Markus Frind isn't intentially a fraud--he's just the completely random and unsuspecting winner of the Google emergent  intellience clickbot spawn lottery.
Markus Frind isn't intentionally a fraud--he's just the completely random and unsuspecting winner of the Google emergent  intelligence clickbot spawn lottery.

Personally, I just don't think it's a great carrer when you add in all the factors. Fincancially it beats ditch digging for sure.
Personally, I just don't think it's a great career when you add in all the factors. Financially it beats ditch digging for sure.

They also report fighting an up hill battle in certain male-dominated environments, where often the males are oblivious to the issue.
They also report fighting an uphill battle in certain male-dominated environments, where often the males are oblivious to the issue

It's not just women, by the way, but other people who exerience discrimination as well.
It's not just women, by the way, but other people who experience discrimination as well.

1. Male Programers beauty 2. Male programers intelligence
1. Male Programmers beauty 2. Male programmers intelligence

If the person is senior, they will say they simple didn't see the reason or something.
If the person is senior, they will say they simply didn't see the reason or something.

rather than having to inventory all the things he may or may not have tried, without explnation as to why he should even be thinking about that, or trying that...
rather than having to inventory all the things he may or may not have tried, without explanation as to why he should even be thinking about that, or trying that...

When I find myself in this situation, for example, in a code review, or when I encounter someone elses code that isn't what I expect, I make sure that I know why I object to it first.
When I find myself in this situation, for example, in a code review, or when I encounter someone else's code that isn't what I expect, I make sure that I know why I object to it first.

How do you stay open so you can continue to grow and recieve from those around you?
How do you stay open so you can continue to grow and receive from those around you?

If you genuinely want to collaberate and learn from others, and if you can keep your ego from getting involved, this will fall into place.
If you genuinely want to collaborate and learn from others, and if you can keep your ego from getting involved, this will fall into place.

People can tell when you aren't confident in yourself and will actually take it as a sign that you aren't at all sure about what it is your are trying to convey.
People can tell when you aren't confident in yourself and will actually take it as a sign that you aren't at all sure about what it is you are trying to convey.

Actually, it looks like you can plug in your on indexer if you want.
Actually, it looks like you can plug in your own indexer if you want.

If you want something really scalable, I guess you'll have to build first a data dictionnary, listing each table and each column in your database.
If you want something really scalable, I guess you'll have to build first a data dictionary, listing each table and each column in your database.

note: the source is not avaialable - read the FAQ
note: the source is not available - read the FAQ

The files are in STS, and once they're their, they're out of your hands.
The files are in STS, and once they're there, they're out of your hands.

oh, but one thing, regrading they will eat just about anything.
oh, but one thing, regarding they will eat just about anything.

Danglely things in general
Dangly things in general

That certainly isnt my way of knowing if he loves me.
That certainly isn't my way of knowing if he loves me.

PHOTONICS TECHONLOGIES: Home Page
PHOTONICS TECHNOLOGIES: Home Page

Barack H. Obama and Joe Biden ate not fools.
Barack H. Obama and Joe Biden are not fools.

Since 1844 and the Westminstet debate over the renewal of the Bank of England charter, it has been accepted doctrine that avoiding deep depression requires that central banks keep financial assets from collapsing.
Since 1844 and the Westminster debate over the renewal of the Bank of England charter, it has been accepted doctrine that avoiding deep depression requires that central banks keep financial assets from collapsing.

In the future, they might want to make people aware during orientation or via some kind of written material included in the new employee's packet, malong with the W-2, health insurance forms, etc...
In the future, they might want to make people aware during orientation or via some kind of written material included in the new employee's packet, along with the W-2, health insurance forms, etc...

Minor point perhaps, but in the field I once studied, diachronic linguistics, people always want to know what the oldest language is, and no amount of explanation will convince them that there question is off-base.
Minor point perhaps, but in the field I once studied, diachronic linguistics, people always want to know what the oldest language is, and no amount of explanation will convince them that their question is off-base.

I have no idea if he is an Extropian, but it does seem pausible. 
I have no idea if he is an Extropian, but it does seem plausible. 

Looking for alternative Collaberative Developing Environements.
Looking for alternative Collaborative Developing Environments.

I am particular interested in providing assistance to novices although I also have an arcane affection for foundation work in functional programming systems.
I am particularly interested in providing assistance to novices although I also have an arcane affection for foundation work in functional programming systems.

It may feel like "thinking in a foregin language", or as if "the words come naturally".
It may feel like "thinking in a foreign language", or as if "the words come naturally".

You will sometimes stumble, looking for a particular word or idiom, but most of the time translation runs in the vast ressources of the "subconcious CPU".
You will sometimes stumble, looking for a particular word or idiom, but most of the time translation runs in the vast resources of the "subconscious CPU".

Transcription is easy, repetetive and easily trained, and abstract solutions can be reused.
Transcription is easy, repetitive and easily trained, and abstract solutions can be reused.

Are comments necessary for a programing language?
Are comments necessary for a programming language?

Your right Marxidad, TODO and tickets could be done similar to Deprecatation, great idea will incorporate that into my design.
You're right Marxidad, TODO and tickets could be done similar to Deprecation, great idea will incorporate that into my design.

By banishing these details to extenral locations, you are reducing the chances that they come to a future reader's awareness, unless your tooling is great.
By banishing these details to external locations, you are reducing the chances that they come to a future reader's awareness, unless your tooling is great.

Besides, people will find ways to add comments if they need to by highjacking strings and misusing variable names (that do nothing other than stand in for comments).
Besides, people will find ways to add comments if they need to by hijacking strings and misusing variable names (that do nothing other than stand in for comments).

My speciality is scripting, network, persistence and data-driven support for games.
My specialty is scripting, network, persistence and data-driven support for games.

All I can say is your totally crazy
All I can say is you're totally crazy

However now this is a hobby project, and I think that Javascript being known by most web developers and because its ECMA, flash and flex developers, a game engine that uses Javascript and XML for scripting would be more user-friendly and cater to a larger user base (and one that so far has not had a chance to use their skills for games) than one with Lua (and there are plenty of those around!).
However now this is a hobby project, and I think that Javascript being known by most web developers and because it's ECMA, flash and flex developers, a game engine that uses Javascript and XML for scripting would be more user-friendly and cater to a larger user base (and one that so far has not had a chance to use their skills for games) than one with Lua (and there are plenty of those around!).

Also for the record I'll go with V8 on this one, mostly because I like it's C++ style.
Also for the record I'll go with V8 on this one, mostly because I like its C++ style.

That might have been skying f.e. (we were located in Switzerland).
That might have been skiing f.e. (we were located in Switzerland).

Anthropologists and comparative literature people have attempted to derive "story grammars" for folk takes around the world.
Anthropologists and comparative literature people have attempted to derive "story grammars" for folk tales around the world.

Read litterature that clearly defines what elements can be found in a story.
Read literature that clearly defines what elements can be found in a story.

Is there anyway to avoid this security issue in Lua?
Is there any way to avoid this security issue in Lua?

He struggles to find a way out of this viscious cirle, discouraged by the large number of things to change in his life to hope for an improvement, even little.
He struggles to find a way out of this vicious circle, discouraged by the large number of things to change in his life to hope for an improvement, even little.

Chad, I have to agree that I have done most of those rituals for the exception of trading for on EVERY song.
Chad, I have to agree that I have done most of those rituals for the exception of trading four on EVERY song.

I am sure you’re familiar with the recording that I m talking about.
I am sure you’re familiar with the recording that I'm talking about.

It should be simple, and understandible by complete novices.
It should be simple, and understandable by complete novices.

Code that explains itself only exists in a perfect world, there is always some weird hack or a reason to do something quick-n-dirty instead of the propper way.
Code that explains itself only exists in a perfect world, there is always some weird hack or a reason to do something quick-n-dirty instead of the proper way.

You will immidiatly find something that isn't exactly clear.
You will immediately find something that isn't exactly clear.

Video-game developement company.
Video-game development company.

well, it's kindof a "tip and tricks" question.
well, it's kind of a "tip and tricks" question.

Have you ever written an useful method which looked totally stupid at first sight?
Have you ever written a useful method which looked totally stupid at first sight?

Sorry no cars, buildings, tree, bushes, Christmas lights, mail boxes , fencing etc. are included even though shown in photos, somehwere ? I think!
Sorry no cars, buildings, tree, bushes, Christmas lights, mail boxes , fencing etc. are included even though shown in photos, somewhere ? I think!

PedEgg™ gently removes callouses and dead skin to give your feet the incredible baby soft look and feel that everybody loves.
PedEgg™ gently removes calluses and dead skin to give your feet the incredible baby soft look and feel that everybody loves.

He was waiting for the idea to be completely fleshed our before taking the leap.
He was waiting for the idea to be completely fleshed out before taking the leap.

Imagine that you can use financial markets to invest now, to be benefit people at time T, and that other people today are already in effect doing this, so that you might induce those people to invest less.
Imagine that you can use financial markets to invest now, to benefit people at time T, and that other people today are already in effect doing this, so that you might induce those people to invest less.

The interesting thing about this bequest is that the apprentices were to repay it at the rate of 5% interest plus 10% of the principle for a period of ten years.
The interesting thing about this bequest is that the apprentices were to repay it at the rate of 5% interest plus 10% of the principal for a period of ten years.

The interest and principle were then to be loaned out to other apprentices for a period of 100 years 
The interest and principal were then to be loaned out to other apprentices for a period of 100 years.

Whether they are warning off the Moorish hordes, threatening to start a civil war if they don’t get their way, fearlessly yelling racial slurs from behind a pseudonym on the internet, or steadfastly proclaiming their indominable will to continue blabbing on about all the super-butch things they’d do if only they hadn’t already made plans to play Starcraft, these Warriors of Words are truly our last line of defense against not having to listen to them.
Whether they are warning off the Moorish hordes, threatening to start a civil war if they don’t get their way, fearlessly yelling racial slurs from behind a pseudonym on the internet, or steadfastly proclaiming their indomitable will to continue blabbing on about all the super-butch things they’d do if only they hadn’t already made plans to play Starcraft, these Warriors of Words are truly our last line of defense against not having to listen to them.

I just hope they remembered to put a stake in its heart and cut off it's head.
I just hope they remembered to put a stake in its heart and cut off its head.

The crisis then, involved something more like dark matter, the ‘missing’ matter in the universe that must exist if it is to work as it does, but can’t at presented be detected.
The crisis then, involved something more like dark matter, the ‘missing’ matter in the universe that must exist if it is to work as it does, but can’t at present be detected.

favored debt instrument specifally for real property
favored debt instrument specifically for real property

So on the one hand we’ve got an asset that is alwyas purchased on large margins, and ont he other an asset that is not usually purchased on margin, and with much smaller ratios where it is.
So on the one hand we’ve got an asset that is always purchased on large margins, and on the other an asset that is not usually purchased on margin, and with much smaller ratios where it is.

It’s true that the sample size is small nd the confidence interval is wide, but qualitatively, the facts are that modern military casualties are low compared to history[11].
It’s true that the sample size is small and the confidence interval is wide, but qualitatively, the facts are that modern military casualties are low compared to history[11].

Brilliant post, but isn’t it a big statistical no-no to include the cases that made you notice the pattern in your research, especially with samll sample sizes?
Brilliant post, but isn’t it a big statistical no-no to include the cases that made you notice the pattern in your research, especially with small sample sizes?

In CVS it is a real bear to rename files, and you simple cannot rename a directory without administrative effort.
In CVS it is a real bear to rename files, and you simply cannot rename a directory without administrative effort.

A magical system that has intgerated specification, requirements engineering, systems engineering, integrates down to code control and bug tracking and feature tracking. It does proejct manangement, and computes when milestones will be hit using evidence based scheduling.
A magical system that has integrated specification, requirements engineering, systems engineering, integrates down to code control and bug tracking and feature tracking. It does project manangement, and computes when milestones will be hit using evidence based scheduling.

reconcilation of OOP and relational data model, and extensions of this
reconciliation of OOP and relational data model, and extensions of this

If your using a chaining hash table, what you really care about is the number of collisions.
If you're using a chaining hash table, what you really care about is the number of collisions.

My problem is that these days I'm a dev mgr over multiple products and dev teams, and that in itself is a major time sync.
My problem is that these days I'm a dev mgr over multiple products and dev teams, and that in itself is a major time sink.

What’s the feasability of running Perl on Rails?
What’s the feasibility of running Perl on Rails?

Because we enjoy using it, its fast to develop with
Because we enjoy using it, it's fast to develop with

I have two simple while loops in my program that I feel aught to be math equations, but I'm struggling to convert them:
I have two simple while loops in my program that I feel ought to be math equations, but I'm struggling to convert them:

There are two sets of program to run for each galaxy
There are two sets of programs to run for each galaxy

a little less down in the dumps bout relationships.
a little less down in the dumps about relationships.

I'm fascinated by RDF and the idea of the sematic web.
I'm fascinated by RDF and the idea of the semantic web.

There are several well know semantic web ontologies like FOAF for decribing people
There are several well known semantic web ontologies like FOAF for describing people

As for understanding the law, I don't think it is appropiate in CS classes,
As for understanding the law, I don't think it is appropriate in CS classes, 

If your going to be working with medical data you need to understand Hippa, or if your dealing with digital media perhaps (isn't there a digitial millenium act signed during Clintons administration?). If your dealing with coporate data perhaps Sarbane's Oxley might be useful. Point is there is so much to learn I feel its better to focus on learning how to be engineers
If you're going to be working with medical data you need to understand Hippa, or if you're dealing with digital media perhaps (isn't there a digital millennium act signed during Clinton's administration?). If you're dealing with corporate data perhaps Sarbanes Oxley might be useful. Point is there is so much to learn I feel it's better to focus on learning how to be engineers

I don't mind good explainations, please don't just give me code.
I don't mind good explanations, please don't just give me code.

I can now separate my main operating system from my development / install whatever I like os using vitualisation setups with Virtual PC or VMWare.
I can now separate my main operating system from my development / install whatever I like os using virtualisation setups with Virtual PC or VMWare.

The questions are for long running algorythms
The questions are for long running algorithms

Either you need skilled programmers (costly) or you need to turn to an other programming language 
Either you need skilled programmers (costly) or you need to turn to another programming language 

Have you own people speak at least once or twice a year.
Have your own people speak at least once or twice a year.

But the Tk toolkit is a wonder: simplexst and easiest I've used in *any* language.
But the Tk toolkit is a wonder: simplest and easiest I've used in *any* language.

consider embeddin the Tcl interpreter and re-casting the application as a plugin API
consider embedding the Tcl interpreter and re-casting the application as a plugin API

Most of the changes occur to accomodate changes in other software such as LaTeX or GNU Emacs.
Most of the changes occur to accommodate changes in other software such as LaTeX or GNU Emacs.

I'm perform occasional fixes and small changes in its FreeBSD source tree version
I perform occasional fixes and small changes in its FreeBSD source tree version

Compatability mode
Compatibility mode

Using C is justified by its simplicity and extreme good fit for programming memoryt. As for type safety, it is like pregancy: you is or you ain't.
Using C is justified by its simplicity and extreme good fit for programming memory. As for type safety, it is like pregnancy: you is or you ain't.

First gsub captures pairs of characters separated by commads and stores assocation in the table t.
First gsub captures pairs of characters separated by commas and stores associations in the table t.

What is going to happen to our primative types when 128-bit processors come out?
What is going to happen to our primitive types when 128-bit processors come out?

past end of string (sentintel location)
past end of string (sentinel location)

There used to be an old add that said something was "Available where ever good thingummies are sold"
There used to be an old ad that said something was "Available where ever good thingummies are sold"

I've been intending to play with CUDA compuation for a while, this seems like a great way to begin.
I've been intending to play with CUDA computation for a while, this seems like a great way to begin.

instead of using a general one that really doesn't hide any of the more difficult pats of the CUDA API
instead of using a general one that really doesn't hide any of the more difficult parts of the CUDA API

I never by a first-edition math book.
I never buy a first-edition math book.

where it is ambigous what it means to choose an outgoing link at random.
where it is ambiguous what it means to choose an outgoing link at random.

He sends his greetings, so you will have to make due with another Swede from Oxford.
He sends his greetings, so you will have to make do with another Swede from Oxford.

There were a lot of people who were very concerned about the large hydron collider destroying the world, and like all good physicists they just laughed it off.
There were a lot of people who were very concerned about the large hadron collider destroying the world, and like all good physicists they just laughed it off.

I have been thinking for a long time that I ought to write a long paper just analyzing sillyness.
I have been thinking for a long time that I ought to write a long paper just analyzing silliness.

On the other hand, it is very fun being a millennealist.
On the other hand, it is very fun being a millennialist.

The following transcript of Anders Sandberg’s GCR08 presentation “Global Catatrophic Risks: An Overview, and Caution about Risk Assessments” has approved by the speaker.
The following transcript of Anders Sandberg’s GCR08 presentation “Global Catatrophic Risks: An Overview, and Caution about Risk Assessments” was approved by the speaker.

Biology is NOT a matter if personal opinion.
Biology is NOT a matter of personal opinion.

Alternative theories and minoriy beliefs, even verifiably incorrect ones, are a matter of interest.
Alternative theories and minority beliefs, even verifiably incorrect ones, are a matter of interest.

Um, Im not seeing the problem here besides the fact that this article doesn't describe some competing "theories".
Um, I'm not seeing the problem here besides the fact that this article doesn't describe some competing "theories".

The major bifucations due to migration are there, sure enough, but it's as if most of the smaller branches and nearly all of the twigs have been blasted off the family tree.
The major bifurcations due to migration are there, sure enough, but it's as if most of the smaller branches and nearly all of the twigs have been blasted off the family tree.

Mito-DNA codes for the structure of the organelle itself and the enzymes for converting carbohydrates to useable energy, which basically keep the cell alive.
Mito-DNA codes for the structure of the organelle itself and the enzymes for converting carbohydrates to usable energy, which basically keep the cell alive.

So I am curious about the academic 'concensus' to which you refer
So I am curious about the academic 'consensus' to which you refer

This and the indication that oral tradition had spanned a longer then 100ka period, put a few questionmarks at the coincedences-theories. Also the article on wich most of this is based does not reach a stronger conclusion really, then that survival rates in tropic refuges would be 300% higher, it does not mention if that correlates with the genetic build up, so i guesstimate that people vye for exclusivity a bit to much in general on these subjects
This and the indication that oral tradition had spanned a longer then 100ka period, put a few question marks at the coincidences-theories. Also the article on which most of this is based does not reach a stronger conclusion really, than that survival rates in tropic refuges would be 300% higher, it does not mention if that correlates with the genetic build up, so i guesstimate that people vie for exclusivity a bit too much in general on these subjects

I wouldnt call the article garbage its based on genetic scientific facts
I wouldn't call the article garbage it's based on genetic scientific facts

How is it possible to migrate from Africa to Australia without passing through the Middle East or fertile cresent?
How is it possible to migrate from Africa to Australia without passing through the Middle East or fertile crescent?

The most interesting aspect of such a hypotheized catastrophe, in my opinion, is that the resulting isolation of the surviving human populations could catalyze speciation in the human lineage.
The most interesting aspect of such a hypothesized catastrophe, in my opinion, is that the resulting isolation of the surviving human populations could catalyze speciation in the human lineage.

Since the Toba explosion is supposed to be one of largest Supervolcano explosions like the big ones in the Yellowstone area without influence on life on earth, we have to conclude that the so-called supervolcano explosions are overestimated or do no take place in the way some geologists want us to believe.
Since the Toba explosion is supposed to be one of largest Supervolcano explosions like the big ones in the Yellowstone area without influence on life on earth, we have to conclude that the so-called supervolcano explosions are overestimated or do not take place in the way some geologists want us to believe.

The editors decided to go around and ask renown programmers and designers about snippets of code
The editors decided to go around and ask renowned programmers and designers about snippets of code

I'd like to lower my agression
I'd like to lower my aggression

by illustrating what a well-designed world that respected its inhabitants free will and self-determination would look like, in contrast to this one
by illustrating what a well-designed world that respected its inhabitants' free will and self-determination would look like, in contrast to this one

The probably best solution will be to open binary files and append the results from the map-phase to theses files.
The probably best solution will be to open binary files and append the results from the map-phase to these files.

There may be enlighting material on the reasons behind this at their site www.nr.com
There may be enlightening material on the reasons behind this at their site www.nr.com

If you want a one-based array, simply ignore the zeroth element and treat is as a one-based array.
If you want a one-based array, simply ignore the zeroth element and treat it as a one-based array.

It's also worth noting that at one point the OCaml debugger (also a time-travel debugger) worked only on bytecode, which was inconvneient, and refused to violate abstraction barriers, which made it useless.
It's also worth noting that at one point the OCaml debugger (also a time-travel debugger) worked only on bytecode, which was inconvenient, and refused to violate abstraction barriers, which made it useless.

This was interesting, but only to lavzy-evaluation weenies.
This was interesting, but only to lazy-evaluation weenies.

An object that represents the state of the game: the players, who's turn it is, the layout of the peices on the board, etc.
An object that represents the state of the game: the players, whose turn it is, the layout of the pieces on the board, etc.

This includes the superfically odd idea of reversible computation.
This includes the superficially odd idea of reversible computation.

I find this book dissapointing.
I find this book disappointing.

This book is different, obviously in the sense that it doesn't deal much with physics, and secondly in the fact that it is not passionatly written, I think.
This book is different, obviously in the sense that it doesn't deal much with physics, and secondly in the fact that it is not passionately written, I think.

I can definitely recomend this book for people intereseted in things like: -theoretical limits of computers (enthropy, energy)
I can definitely recommend this book for people interested in things like: -theoretical limits of computers (entropy, energy)

The book starts out at such a leisurely pace that one is fooled into thinking that it will be finshed in a few days read
The book starts out at such a leisurely pace that one is fooled into thinking that it will be finished in a few days read

Feynman explains the fundamentals of computers--both themathematics and the physics at the heart of computing.
Feynman explains the fundamentals of computers--both the mathematics and the physics at the heart of computing.

He gives theappropriate amount of detail, enough to explain his points, but not so much that the reader gets bogged down.
He gives the appropriate amount of detail, enough to explain his points, but not so much that the reader gets bogged down.

It covers to some depth many of the topics of a computer science education, but also includes a lot of material from physics and engineering related to how semiconductor chips of the early eightys operate.
It covers to some depth many of the topics of a computer science education, but also includes a lot of material from physics and engineering related to how semiconductor chips of the early eighties operate.

Dissapointing is correct
Disappointing is correct

but the examples provided of how Feynman actullally worked it out can be compared with some of Arnol'd's presentations of how he worked out mechanics problems in his text on Classical Mechanics (state the problem, then state the final result).
but the examples provided of how Feynman actually worked it out can be compared with some of Arnol'd's presentations of how he worked out mechanics problems in his text on Classical Mechanics (state the problem, then state the final result).

Every physics student should be required to take a good class in molecular biolgy these days
Every physics student should be required to take a good class in molecular biology these days

In desparate looking around for something we don't eat all the time anyway, I bought a boneless pheasant stuffed with apples and calvados.
In desperate looking around for something we don't eat all the time anyway, I bought a boneless pheasant stuffed with apples and calvados.

I know their are free alternatives
I know there are free alternatives

My personal preference is a custom setup with CherryPy, simply because I don't like the heirarchy and opaqueness that full-stack frameworks try to enforce.
My personal preference is a custom setup with CherryPy, simply because I don't like the hierarchy and opaqueness that full-stack frameworks try to enforce.

Definately put it in a new class.
Definitely put it in a new class.

Probably ants have some randomization mechanism in their behaviour, othervize they would exticnt long time ago.
Probably ants have some randomization mechanism in their behaviour, otherwize they would extinct long time ago.

Morals are simply a way of defeating Prisoners’ Dillemas
Morals are simply a way of defeating Prisoners’ Dilemmas

Incompatilist
Incompatibilist

I end up with the slightly disturbing thought that killing ppl by taking them out in an instant, and without anyone every knowing they were there does not necesarry seem to be inherently evil.
I end up with the slightly disturbing thought that killing ppl by taking them out in an instant, and without anyone ever knowing they were there does not necessarily seem to be inherently evil.

If the RPOP is going to upload us all or something similar, doesn't ve need to be sure that the uploads will still be people.
If the RPOP is going to upload us all or something similar, doesn't we need to be sure that the uploads will still be people.

Personally I fail to see how encoding something in physical matter makes the pattern anymore real.
Personally I fail to see how encoding something in physical matter makes the pattern any more real.

my uncle runs a one-man software company that was once the software departement of an general IT company.
my uncle runs a one-man software company that was once the software department of a general IT company.

Alot of development these days is done in .NET or Java
A lot of development these days is done in .NET or Java

Pure hands-on programming education programs (non-university non-bachelorofengineering) do not have alot of applicants, however they have the best profile for what my uncle wants.
Pure hands-on programming education programs (non-university non-bachelor of engineering) do not have a lot of applicants, however they have the best profile for what my uncle wants.

How would you advice this one-man company in regards to recruiting?
How would you advise this one-man company in regards to recruiting?

Here, he combats the scourge of mean bumper stickers by pretending that the  Select Committee on Intelligence’s “Phase 2” report on the use of intelligence to sell the Iraq War completely exhonerates the Bush Administration
Here, he combats the scourge of mean bumper stickers by pretending that the  Select Committee on Intelligence’s “Phase 2” report on the use of intelligence to sell the Iraq War completely exonerates the Bush Administration

Whether putting out rigorous position papers in the competative, results-oriented world of a right-wing think tank
Whether putting out rigorous position papers in the competitive, results-oriented world of a right-wing think tank

How can it be anti-Semetic and fascist?
How can it be anti-Semitic and fascist?

muscial
musical

investors responded like pigs at the tough
investors responded like pigs at the trough

Have the government buy and sell shirt-term assets in order to keep the stock of inside money balances growing smoothly.
Have the government buy and sell short-term assets in order to keep the stock of inside money balances growing smoothly.

Kelly’s extended mediation on what, exactly, the origin of progress is.
Kelly’s extended meditation on what, exactly, the origin of progress is.

The Irreverisble Crisis
The Irreversible Crisis

Why rational-expectations-and-efficiency is demonstrably not right, though there's no comprehensive replacemen
Why rational-expectations-and-efficiency is demonstrably not right, though there's no comprehensive replacement

And state court's would have to respect that decision.
And state courts would have to respect that decision.

Scala comes out of a research lab where as clojure's stated goal is to be a pragmatic programming language
Scala comes out of a research lab whereas clojure's stated goal is to be a pragmatic programming language

There is a lot of Java code out there that won't go away over night
There is a lot of Java code out there that won't go away overnight

But the idosyncracies still show through.
But the idiosyncrasies still show through.

I've re-written a few project to be MUCH cleaner through the experience I gain.
I've re-written a few projects to be MUCH cleaner through the experience I gain.

Be careful about this one, cause it can byte you in the butt, but it always helps.
Be careful about this one, cause it can bite you in the butt, but it always helps.

Provide flexiable starting times especially to those just getting out of college and not used to working a "day job"
Provide flexible starting times especially to those just getting out of college and not used to working a "day job"

In charicature,
In caricature,

though the faces and looks are sometimes idiocyncratic
though the faces and looks are sometimes idiosyncratic

propriatary trading models
proprietary trading models

Why are the messages that come with all of that emotion, all of that sense of community and support and comraderie, three or four or five years old or more?
Why are the messages that come with all of that emotion, all of that sense of community and support and camaraderie, three or four or five years old or more?

Mercy stood over the prostate man
Mercy stood over the prostrate man

the tendons in Soctt's neck
the tendons in Scott's neck

unfortunately it's taken almost four decades for us to create the technology and more importantly the corpa
unfortunately it's taken almost four decades for us to create the technology and more importantly the corpora

This is the post-rationalist, post-Chomskian age, and this book is a complete and self-contained introduction to the emperical methods of statistical natural lanagage processing that define it.
This is the post-rationalist, post-Chomskian age, and this book is a complete and self-contained introduction to the empirical methods of statistical natural language processing that define it.

Indeed, a lot of this is parallel to the post-9/11 panicy discussions about security.
Indeed, a lot of this is parallel to the post-9/11 panicky discussions about security.

Overaccumulation and overproduction have been the chronic crisis tendencies of state capitqlism since at least the 1890s.
Overaccumulation and overproduction have been the chronic crisis tendencies of state capitalism since at least the 1890s.

In addition to Deregulaiton and Deregulation, there is also Deregulation:
In addition to Deregulation and Deregulation, there is also Deregulation:

I actually think regulators should be very cautious about moving too regulate new business models. 
I actually think regulators should be very cautious about moving to regulate new business models. 

Chapter 25 on Ontologies surprising states "it is not clear to what extent NLP technology, in its current form, needs such ontologies and their complex knowledge representation systems".
Chapter 25 on Ontologies surprisingly states "it is not clear to what extent NLP technology, in its current form, needs such ontologies and their complex knowledge representation systems".

But you can mecahnically eliminate the tail call
But you can mechanically eliminate the tail call

My heart lept.
My heart leapt.

Or else you'll invent something feindishly clever only to find that some academic already wrote about it 20 years ago and showed why it doesn't work.
Or else you'll invent something fiendishly clever only to find that some academic already wrote about it 20 years ago and showed why it doesn't work.

I've built (if I can say so), some of the current best de-anonymiztion tools/techniques
I've built (if I can say so), some of the current best de-anonymization tools/techniques

While nearly all univerersities offer the common majors of “History”, “Chemistry” or “Economics”, one only needs to search for the more uniquely phrased majors to discover a shared home institution.
While nearly all universities offer the common majors of “History”, “Chemistry” or “Economics”, one only needs to search for the more uniquely phrased majors to discover a shared home institution.

This is the worst of all possible worlds, since not only can we not solve hard problems on average but we apparantly do not get any cryptographic advantage from the hardness of these problems.
This is the worst of all possible worlds, since not only can we not solve hard problems on average but we apparently do not get any cryptographic advantage from the hardness of these problems.

markets encourage people to specialize, creating even greater disparaties in comparative advantage
markets encourage people to specialize, creating even greater disparities in comparative advantage

Any of Marvin Misky's books
Any of Marvin Minsky's books

Nothing phased him
Nothing fazed him

he always recommends medicine, rest, and palliatives, as well as the patient’s metal focus on his weakness and infirmities.
he always recommends medicine, rest, and palliatives, as well as the patient’s mental focus on his weakness and infirmities.

It’s convenience is far beyond plain MapReduce and Cascading, it is like SQL.
Its convenience is far beyond plain MapReduce and Cascading, it is like SQL.

Certain words construct dictionary entries for the words they preceed
Certain words construct dictionary entries for the words they precede

Each such word indentifies the code to be executed when its entry is encountered.
Each such word identifies the code to be executed when its entry is encountered.

Clearly different entries will require different amounts of core, which complicates the dictinoary search.
Clearly different entries will require different amounts of core, which complicates the dictionary search.

The software provided with large conmputers supplies a heirarchy of languages
The software provided with large computers supplies a hierarchy of languages

We insert FORTH between man and machine and define 2 dictionaraies: man-FORTH and FORTH-machine.
We insert FORTH between man and machine and define 2 dictionaries: man-FORTH and FORTH-machine.

The convention the words may start with special characters increases the set of words with mnemonic value. 
The convention that words may start with special characters increases the set of words with mnemonic value. 

Manipulated the character pointer permits a remarkably simple and independent scanner.
Manipulating the character pointer permits a remarkably simple and independent scanner.

For example, imput is initially expected from the keyboard.
For example, input is initially expected from the keyboard.

The first word would probably cause input to be read from disk - expanding the dictinary.
The first word would probably cause input to be read from disk - expanding the dictionary.

The scanner accepts input indiscriminantly from keyboard, disk and dictionary.
The scanner accepts input indiscriminately from keyboard, disk and dictionary.

This has 2 desirable effets:
This has 2 desirable effects:

FORTH, to an honesty significant extent, only supplies the tools whereby a user can construct a language that looks as he wants it to.
FORTH, to an honestly significant extent, only supplies the tools whereby a user can construct a language that looks as he wants it to.

It is useful to distinguish 2 classes of words: those that cause instrutions to be generated and those that do not. 
It is useful to distinguish 2 classes of words: those that cause instructions to be generated and those that do not. 

Verbs are harder to code, bu are most versatile as they may use the full hardware instruction set and are 100 times faster in execution.
Verbs are harder to code, but are most versatile as they may use the full hardware instruction set and are 100 times faster in execution.

The colon preceeding SUMSQ indicates that it is a definition, so the scanner is directed to the character string following it.
The colon preceding SUMSQ indicates that it is a definition, so the scanner is directed to the character string following it.

We also developed a report generator that would select, sort and print records from sequential files with an ease and versitility beyond the range of a conventional approach.
We also developed a report generator that would select, sort and print records from sequential files with an ease and versatility beyond the range of a conventional approach.

In February 1969, we generated FORTH fo the Burroughs B-5500.
In February 1969, we generated FORTH for the Burroughs B-5500.

Go onto a Tolkein newsgroup or discussion forum
Go onto a Tolkien newsgroup or discussion forum

That won't work either since a Branch could have another braches as children, and that's why I used recursion.
That won't work either since a Branch could have another branches as children, and that's why I used recursion.

Here's the ammended code:
Here's the amended code:

Was it you, was me, did I watch to much T.V.?
Was it you, was me, did I watch too much T.V.?

And, because the kids who start out relatively older get streamed into the elite teams and they get an advantage that translates into there being more likely to get extra practice.
And, because the kids who start out relatively older get streamed into the elite teams and they get an advantage that translates into their being more likely to get extra practice.

Gladwell then discusses, briefly, similar effects having to do with performance in school: the relatively older kids to better.
Gladwell then discusses, briefly, similar effects having to do with performance in school: the relatively older kids do better.

Anyways, why not build an AI who's goal was to non-coercively increase the intelligence of mankind?
Anyways, why not build an AI whose goal was to non-coercively increase the intelligence of mankind?

This is not a zero sum game, although relatvity does matter.
This is not a zero sum game, although relativity does matter.

Also, the vast majority of non-religious folks also reject the projects your favor, so you can't say religion is the major reason for that rejection.
Also, the vast majority of non-religious folks also reject the projects you favor, so you can't say religion is the major reason for that rejection.

It was also possible to commit groups of persistent variables simultaniously, thus providing transactions
It was also possible to commit groups of persistent variables simultaneously, thus providing transactions

The exclaimation mark, '!', means 'apply'
The exclamation mark, '!', means 'apply'

Atrios is quite right that the "failure" of the virginity pledge/abstinance-only programs is really a feature, not a bug
Atrios is quite right that the "failure" of the virginity pledge/abstinence-only programs is really a feature, not a bug

Which leaves stylistic efflorecense
Which leaves stylistic efflorescence

We can make a pretty good guess as to what costumes looked like given the materials being used, and the sowing styles (knots, shanks, and the like.)
We can make a pretty good guess as to what costumes looked like given the materials being used, and the sewing styles (knots, shanks, and the like.)

Hats were  also super important, they were wore almost all the time by all men and women of any class.
Hats were  also super important, they were worn almost all the time by all men and women of any class.

A decade ago, I found that the use of natural amino acid precursors could patially remit a fatal neurodegenerative condition
A decade ago, I found that the use of natural amino acid precursors could partially remit a fatal neurodegenerative condition

So it doesn’t sound like she “expecftes a researcher . . . to be honest.”
So it doesn’t sound like she “expects a researcher . . . to be honest.”

except in pathological states like folie a duex and romantic love
except in pathological states like folie a deux and romantic love

e.g. inhibition from fontal structures and skin receptors
e.g. inhibition from frontal structures and skin receptors

About “AUTOMATIC TEXT SUMMARIZER (lingustic based)”
About “AUTOMATIC TEXT SUMMARIZER (linguistic based)”

in my mind this book is a perfect compliment to an electromagnetism or a vector calculus class
in my mind this book is a perfect complement to an electromagnetism or a vector calculus class

Its streghs are its concise reviews of the mechanics that go into crunching the math.
Its strengths are its concise reviews of the mechanics that go into crunching the math.

Not just because it's clear and I resonnate with the overall coding philosophy
Not just because it's clear and I resonate with the overall coding philosophy

I’ve been calling Wikipedia “an artificat produced as a byproduct of conversation” for a while.
I’ve been calling Wikipedia “an artifact produced as a byproduct of conversation” for a while.

overriden
overridden

life is though.
life is tough.

Actually, if the misspelling is in effect the most frequent searched term, the algorythm will take it for the right one.
Actually, if the misspelling is in effect the most frequent searched term, the algorithm will take it for the right one.

Its useful for each direction to know its neighbors.
It's useful for each direction to know its neighbors.

the lawest bit of N
the lowest bit of N

While carring RAM based state is workable, the word look-up needs to happen "in place" & read-only.
While carrying RAM based state is workable, the word look-up needs to happen "in place" & read-only.

The principle problem in programming is the management of complexity.
The principal problem in programming is the management of complexity.

Brendan Eich convinced his pointy-haired boss at Netscape that the Navigator browser should have its own scripting language, and that only a new language would do, a new language designed and implemented in big hurry, and that no existing language should be considered for that role.
Brendan Eich convinced his pointy-haired boss at Netscape that the Navigator browser should have its own scripting language, and that only a new language would do, a new language designed and implemented in a big hurry, and that no existing language should be considered for that role.

Scores can also go up because more people are gaming the system y hiring test tutors.
Scores can also go up because more people are gaming the system by hiring test tutors.

there is tao framework if you would like to do tings from scratch, like me. It is a opengl framwork(with more) for C#.
there is tao framework if you would like to do things from scratch, like me. It is an opengl framework(with more) for C#.

I need a good book to realy understand the topic in detail.
I need a good book to really understand the topic in detail.

all the longitues are lines through 0, and all the latitudes are circles around 0
all the longitudes are lines through 0, and all the latitudes are circles around 0

Remove the shotgun dating approach from my repetoire.
Remove the shotgun dating approach from my repertoire.

However... as Kvothe actually begins his story the book becomes insantly addicting.
However... as Kvothe actually begins his story the book becomes instantly addicting.

The dialogue had whit and was clever and even funny in parts.
The dialogue had wit and was clever and even funny in parts.

After theiving and hiding and trying to survive, he makes his way to the University to study the Arcane arts and the book finds its focal point.
After thieving and hiding and trying to survive, he makes his way to the University to study the Arcane arts and the book finds its focal point.

Everything he tries to do, he excells at: music, theiving, arcane arts, outdoor survivalism and various other random things.
Everything he tries to do, he excels at: music, theiving, arcane arts, outdoor survivalism and various other random things.

I ususally don't mind this, but Kvothe's story doesn't really come to any kind of head or give a satisfying conclusion.
I usually don't mind this, but Kvothe's story doesn't really come to any kind of head or give a satisfying conclusion.

This book could have been a lot better with a ruthless editor willing to cut out some of the tangenital side stories and cut back on a lot of the repetitous stuff both in the street orphan sequence and once the main character gets to the university.
This book could have been a lot better with a ruthless editor willing to cut out some of the tangential side stories and cut back on a lot of the repetitious stuff both in the street orphan sequence and once the main character gets to the university.

The idea here is that moral theories get more influence the more probable they are; yet even a relatively weak theory can still get its way on some issues that the theory think are extremely important by sacrificing its influence on other issues that other theories deem more important.
The idea here is that moral theories get more influence the more probable they are; yet even a relatively weak theory can still get its way on some issues that the theory thinks are extremely important by sacrificing its influence on other issues that other theories deem more important.

Written in mideval times, before radio and TV, families gathered in their huts and told folk stories.
Written in medieval times, before radio and TV, families gathered in their huts and told folk stories.

The discovery of an idea or a phemonenon -- rather than the direct presenation of it -- seems to have such an excitement and electricity to it that the engagement (and I'm sure the retention of it) are phenomenal.
The discovery of an idea or a phenomenon -- rather than the direct presentation of it -- seems to have such an excitement and electricity to it that the engagement (and I'm sure the retention of it) are phenomenal.

or of course, somethings are displayed as inspiration and some things are left to be explored
or of course, some things are displayed as inspiration and some things are left to be explored

You used the yo-yo to hit the coins, and hat the number on the coin added to your score
You used the yo-yo to hit the coins, and had the number on the coin added to your score

maybe polite acceptance, maybe a bit of curiousity for an hour, or maybe no interest.
maybe polite acceptance, maybe a bit of curiosity for an hour, or maybe no interest.

instead of purusing it in a way that is meaningful, or perhaps pursuing something else simply because it's exciting
instead of pursuing it in a way that is meaningful, or perhaps pursuing something else simply because it's exciting

Capitalism often result in a winner-takes-all scenario where collaboration and diversity are irrelevant.
Capitalism often results in a winner-takes-all scenario where collaboration and diversity are irrelevant.

It spend too many pages (about 30 or more) in "Family stories and affairs" that is a pure "torture" and absolutely useless to the reader eager to learn about investement strategies..
It spend too many pages (about 30 or more) in "Family stories and affairs" that is a pure "torture" and absolutely useless to the reader eager to learn about investment strategies..

Static Code Analizers for Python
Static Code Analyzers for Python

I hate laundrymats
I hate laundromats

I’ve found two Craislist mashups to be quite helpful:
I’ve found two Craigslist mashups to be quite helpful:

If your afraid of cameras, large animals, or dominant women think twice.
If you're afraid of cameras, large animals, or dominant women think twice.

If you want to learn how to ride and train your horse using sustainable methods give em a shout.
If you want to learn how to ride and train your horse using sustainable methods give me a shout.

My bird was know as a 'chainsaw with wings in his previous home.
My bird was known as a 'chainsaw with wings in his previous home.

All these animals have turned around in to wonderful and trustworthy companions.
All these animals have turned around into wonderful and trustworthy companions.

Not sure it's a straw man argument, but your right.
Not sure it's a straw man argument, but you're right.

He crys the great beagle cry when she won’t let him in.
He cries the great beagle cry when she won’t let him in.

He sleep at her feet of the bed, and GOD FORBID actually listens to her sometimes.
He sleeps at her feet of the bed, and GOD FORBID actually listens to her sometimes.

I gett greeted by Brandon, the boarder collie.
I get greeted by Brandon, the border collie.

Apart from whether we like infinity or not, though, you're going to run into trouble if you try to apply "All infinite things are just approximations of finitely-expressible things" to the work of people like Goedel and Turing on computible numbers.
Apart from whether we like infinity or not, though, you're going to run into trouble if you try to apply "All infinite things are just approximations of finitely-expressible things" to the work of people like Goedel and Turing on computable numbers.

Clearly some canoniclaization algorithm terminates on it
Clearly some canonicalization algorithm terminates on it

Villians were particularly vile, the heroes goody to a fault, and the bumbling and curious people of Earth typecast enough to be familiar but unique enough to make it fresh, engaging, and original.
Villains were particularly vile, the heroes goody to a fault, and the bumbling and curious people of Earth typecast enough to be familiar but unique enough to make it fresh, engaging, and original.

all the venting goes to my LJ and pretty much no where else.
all the venting goes to my LJ and pretty much nowhere else.

The amount of time and effort waisted when one of these cowboys falls off his horse is amazing
The amount of time and effort wasted when one of these cowboys falls off his horse is amazing

I would be really surprized if a comptetent (.NET) developer (no matter how unexperienced) could not find a decent position in London in 1-2 months.
I would be really surprised if a competent (.NET) developer (no matter how inexperienced) could not find a decent position in London in 1-2 months.

over the last 6 months the number of them has definetly diminished
over the last 6 months the number of them has definitely diminished

Its not you. Its everybody else!
It's not you. It's everybody else!

Most books are structured around the CS concepts and the langauge features.
Most books are structured around the CS concepts and the language features.

It was funny and engaging, and I decided to read some more of this guys books.
It was funny and engaging, and I decided to read some more of this guy's books.

Keeping original format POST passing throw AWK
Keeping original format POST passing through AWK

Years later the company had allowed new product development to whither but were still selling the old products as a cash cow.
Years later the company had allowed new product development to wither but were still selling the old products as a cash cow.

Unfortunately it's use has been limited.
Unfortunately its use has been limited.

Thus, ACLs only make an apperance on the edges of the system
Thus, ACLs only make an appearance on the edges of the system

this particular attack leaves indeniable evidence lying around.
this particular attack leaves undeniable evidence lying around.

I don't expect there to be many people with their hands left raised after such a though experiment.
I don't expect there to be many people with their hands left raised after such a thought experiment.

Many people seem to find it relatively easy to find a state of mind where they can "honestly" saying whatever is in their interest to say, no matter what other beliefs their minds may hold.
Many people seem to find it relatively easy to find a state of mind where they can "honestly" say whatever is in their interest to say, no matter what other beliefs their minds may hold.

We are great with creating webapplications with ajax aswell as write a desktop application.
We are great with creating webapplications with ajax as well as write a desktop application.

Trying to verify correctness by ure reason—as opposed to trial-and-error testing—looks almost hopeless.
Trying to verify correctness by pure reason—as opposed to trial-and-error testing—looks almost hopeless.

the maxium year
the maximum year

making Franken's eventual victory now appaear all but certain.
making Franken's eventual victory now appear all but certain.

Both, significantly, increased the defense budget to combat threats which bore less and less resemblence to the 40’s-50’s Nazi/Soviet model.
Both, significantly, increased the defense budget to combat threats which bore less and less resemblance to the 40’s-50’s Nazi/Soviet model.

Finally, it’s worth observing that, over 6 decades of various strategies backed by great expendatures of political and actual capital from several international actors, nothing fundamental has been resolved.
Finally, it’s worth observing that, over 6 decades of various strategies backed by great expenditures of political and actual capital from several international actors, nothing fundamental has been resolved.

for a person with a big round muscular bottoum like, for example, me
for a person with a big round muscular bottom like, for example, me

Both try to accomodate the others needs.
Both try to accommodate the other's needs.

Thomas Ashton has staed that... the Bank of England was already the lender of last resort in the eighteenth century
Thomas Ashton has stated that... the Bank of England was already the lender of last resort in the eighteenth century

Time and time again in these pages it has been stressed that when the macroeconomic system is constrained by a tight supply of money, it creates more, at leaset for a time...
Time and time again in these pages it has been stressed that when the macroeconomic system is constrained by a tight supply of money, it creates more, at least for a time...

and more and more it becomes cleer that not everyone can do so at once
and more and more it becomes clear that not everyone can do so at once

There are bound to be questions raised as to whehter the Establishment took care of its own and rejected the outsiders and pushy upstarts...
There are bound to be questions raised as to whether the Establishment took care of its own and rejected the outsiders and pushy upstarts...

As with audio, a Babel of formats appers, and converting these formats becomes a huge issue.
As with audio, a Babel of formats appears, and converting these formats becomes a huge issue.

Unfortunatley many spreadsheets are as empty as the Sahara and almost as big.
Unfortunately many spreadsheets are as empty as the Sahara and almost as big.

what is the use of debug.h while makin an application in c++?
what is the use of debug.h while making an application in c++?

I work at a startup which has a principle product that is a desktop application.
I work at a startup which has a principal product that is a desktop application.

that's the 4th field of knowledge, and a seperate one at that.
that's the 4th field of knowledge, and a separate one at that.

And while this may come off as sounding negative, compatable conflict resolution styles.
And while this may come off as sounding negative, compatible conflict resolution styles.

Give the detail to execute 100 million times and may be there are optimiztion out the functino call.
Give the detail to execute 100 million times and maybe there are optimization out the function call.

habituation effects byte really hard
habituation effects bite really hard

This is more work for the programmer, but is o different from what C++ offers with STL allocators.
This is more work for the programmer, but is no different from what C++ offers with STL allocators.

Its hard to get benchmark data that is relevent to your set of applications, but here's some data:
It's hard to get benchmark data that is relevant to your set of applications, but here's some data:

Lisp has moved down, now beaing an order of magnitude behind the others in most categories.
Lisp has moved down, now being an order of magnitude behind the others in most categories.

Everything pails in comparison... so does my attention.
Everything palls in comparison... so does my attention.

That, and every scare article about Millenials being the most spoiled, self-aggrandizing generation ever.
That, and every scare article about Millennials being the most spoiled, self-aggrandizing generation ever.

It just seems a lot more normal when I say "Oh, I added the FriendFeed FaceBook app" then when you say "Turn to channel me."
It just seems a lot more normal when I say "Oh, I added the FriendFeed FaceBook app" than when you say "Turn to channel me."

Unlike Facebook (which seems like it's trying to re-invent everything on the Internet inside it's little bubble o'beacon-tracking)
Unlike Facebook (which seems like it's trying to re-invent everything on the Internet inside its little bubble o'beacon-tracking)

Maybe the only reason I don't have friendfeed is it's welcome page.
Maybe the only reason I don't have friendfeed is its welcome page.

Laissez-faire capitialism doesn't exist outside of flea markets.
Laissez-faire capitalism doesn't exist outside of flea markets.

I use a laxidasical reading technique: I read the document 3 times over, each session punctuated by series of breaks. I
I use a lackadaisical reading technique: I read the document 3 times over, each session punctuated by series of breaks. I

I've given some thought to bondafide speed reading
I've given some thought to bona fide speed reading

I don’t want to jynx myself!
I don’t want to jinx myself!

jakuzzi
jacuzzi

transgressing boundries
transgressing boundaries

Anyone whose ever tried to share a twin be with another person knows how cozy it is.
Anyone whose ever tried to share a twin bed with another person knows how cozy it is.

I don't find the eternal night/grundgy cityscape exciting, nor a society that seems to be made up of singles in their twenties and thirties, ho hint of a family anywhere
I don't find the eternal night/grungy cityscape exciting, nor a society that seems to be made up of singles in their twenties and thirties, no hint of a family anywhere

it seems to simplistic even if the reminder crops up
it seems too simplistic even if the reminder crops up

My primary criterion for choosing courses was to cover topics that were raised in this magnificant, panoramic, and brilliantly interesting book
My primary criterion for choosing courses was to cover topics that were raised in this magnificent, panoramic, and brilliantly interesting book

maybe thats VC backed ones were you aren't focusing on cashflow up front??
maybe that's VC backed ones where you aren't focusing on cashflow up front??

If he sticks to his rant-personality, he will sooner or later become on of the stars of the internet.
If he sticks to his rant-personality, he will sooner or later become one of the stars of the internet.

I'd like stories, I'd be estatic with a frequency analysis that I could show
I'd like stories, I'd be ecstatic with a frequency analysis that I could show

An useful innovation has to be useful, and not just be a new idea.
A useful innovation has to be useful, and not just be a new idea.

The seeds of hatred where there.
The seeds of hatred were there.

To defend here I should say that she is a therapist and works with very ill people all day long and therfor has some other priority about what should matter in life.
To defend her I should say that she is a therapist and works with very ill people all day long and therefore has some other priority about what should matter in life.

And that is good, because it grounded's me some times when my thougts are to high up on programming and working problems.
And that is good, because it grounds me sometimes when my thoughts are too high up on programming and working problems.

Nowadays she quited programming.
Nowadays she quitted programming.

Here is a partial answer to my own question of how should we behave, directed especially to the next president and members of his or her administration but also to all of use who will be relieved by the change
Here is a partial answer to my own question of how should we behave, directed especially to the next president and members of his or her administration but also to all of us who will be relieved by the change

Someone should alert the numerous waterboarding Japanese leaders and soliders whom we convicted of torture in post-World War II war crimes trials
Someone should alert the numerous waterboarding Japanese leaders and soldiers whom we convicted of torture in post-World War II war crimes trials

Your real "country" is where your heading.
Your real "country" is where you're heading.

He warned about haveing your insurance roled intothe cost of your car pacage and asorted things (that would make a warante that was 124 end up costing like over 600 or someting like that,) how to look for fdbait and switch, and to not buy a car from a man named smileing Sam that sold cars from a Trailer.
He warned about having your insurance rolled into the cost of your car package and assorted things (that would make a warrant that was 124 end up costing like over 600 or someting like that,) how to look for bait and switch, and to not buy a car from a man named smiling Sam that sold cars from a Trailer.

This was wisdom that he dispenced off the books I think.
This was wisdom that he dispensed off the books I think.

he also gave advice on shoping and buying can goods as part of his math.
he also gave advice on shopping and buying can goods as part of his math.

My two notions at this point is that a parlimentery system would help.
My two notions at this point is that a parliamentary system would help.

The term social singularity refers to an event that could not be defined/forecast with available knowledgwe with society.
The term social singularity refers to an event that could not be defined/forecast with available knowledge with society.

in social space there are continious events, empty spaces and singularities
in social space there are continuous events, empty spaces and singularities

I feel a bit more secure and confidant than I did 5 minutes ago.
I feel a bit more secure and confident than I did 5 minutes ago.

which did wrong when multiple occurences of the same image in the IDS have different tags
which did wrong when multiple occurrences of the same image in the IDS have different tags

It's big in Russia (http://cache.gawker.com/assets/resources/Picture%20360.jpg) and so you do get a network affect.
It's big in Russia (http://cache.gawker.com/assets/resources/Picture%20360.jpg) and so you do get a network effect.

It's not a great network affect like AIM or Facebook, but it's definitely there.
It's not a great network effect like AIM or Facebook, but it's definitely there.

The issue is not intell guy or non-intell guy.
The issue is not intel guy or non-intel guy.

I’ve not seen anyone doing the later but it’s a simple, easy to implement concept.
I’ve not seen anyone doing the latter but it’s a simple, easy to implement concept.

It's worth noting that where American troops are stationed and in harms way - Afghanistan and Iraq - there has also been significant popular hostility
It's worth noting that where American troops are stationed and in harm's way - Afghanistan and Iraq - there has also been significant popular hostility

What does a person do when a terrorist organization deliberately enscones itself in a civilian populace?
What does a person do when a terrorist organization deliberately ensconces itself in a civilian populace?

Finally the message name is passed to the retults, returning an array with the name of the only object left.
Finally the message name is passed to the results, returning an array with the name of the only object left.

This caused the phone numbers to be lost for many thousands of survey respondents, which was particularly hairy, because the purpose of the survey was to get peoples permission to call them.
This caused the phone numbers to be lost for many thousands of survey respondents, which was particularly hairy, because the purpose of the survey was to get people's permission to call them.

Are there any know solutions to preventing this behaviour?
Are there any known solutions to preventing this behaviour?

Knowing a story and, still more, telling a story signals our own capacities for altruistic interest, affect, and punishment, capacities that the story will represent its characters manifesting in order to appeal to the audiences interest in monitoring these things.
Knowing a story and, still more, telling a story signals our own capacities for altruistic interest, affect, and punishment, capacities that the story will represent its characters manifesting in order to appeal to the audience's interest in monitoring these things.

This seems to jive with the theme of this post
This seems to jibe with the theme of this post

Though I'm not sure the signaling is necissarily the story as much as how the audience reacts to them. 
Though I'm not sure the signaling is necessarily the story as much as how the audience reacts to them. 

The first Kindle was also designed to slip the bonds of its cover, so that you can test it's free-fall capabilities several times a day.
The first Kindle was also designed to slip the bonds of its cover, so that you can test its free-fall capabilities several times a day.

The user-experience of the Kindle, beyond it's disastrous industrial design, is really remarkable for a first-release product.
The user-experience of the Kindle, beyond its disastrous industrial design, is really remarkable for a first-release product.

it has different attachments to stimulate the clitorus
it has different attachments to stimulate the clitoris

I guess my mom ate alot of awsome.
I guess my mom ate a lot of awesome.

um... the phsyco chick is cool, but your pretty hot!
um... the psycho chick is cool, but you're pretty hot!

Sumhow reminds me of 1984... the girl in the Junior-Anti-Sex-League^^
Somehow reminds me of 1984... the girl in the Junior-Anti-Sex-League^^

Reasonig about combinators (a lambda-calculus puzzle on composing compositions)
Reasoning about combinators (a lambda-calculus puzzle on composing compositions)

So I am working on this class that's suppose to request help documentation from a vendor through web service.
So I am working on this class that's supposed to request help documentation from a vendor through web service.

When every sensible name seems too long or ambigious, you can try using something a little less sensible
When every sensible name seems too long or ambiguous, you can try using something a little less sensible

Software designed in a primarily single or dual CPU world starts to show it's age and performance limitation
Software designed in a primarily single or dual CPU world starts to show its age and performance limitation

It's locking is expensive and not granular enough to utilize all those cores.
Its locking is expensive and not granular enough to utilize all those cores.

As usual, your own anti-mdicine bias leads you to give a contrarian study an unwarranted level of credence. Check the literature and you'll find there have been numerous studies specifically about the payoff of various health care interventions in African nations, showing benifits ranging from moderate to huge depending on the study and the nature of the intervention.
As usual, your own anti-medicine bias leads you to give a contrarian study an unwarranted level of credence. Check the literature and you'll find there have been numerous studies specifically about the payoff of various health care interventions in African nations, showing benefits ranging from moderate to huge depending on the study and the nature of the intervention.

I think you need to either read the study more carefully or brush up on you statistics before jumping to conclusions
I think you need to either read the study more carefully or brush up on your statistics before jumping to conclusions

Thus an angle is chosen uniformly arounf the circle via the random variable V
Thus an angle is chosen uniformly around the circle via the random variable V

Sounds like you are ethnical.
Sounds like you are ethical.

At universtiy, it wasn't the books, and it wasn't the curses that tought me much.
At university, it wasn't the books, and it wasn't the courses that taught me much.

with such high resolution that structures only 20 times the size of our own Solar System are discernable.
with such high resolution that structures only 20 times the size of our own Solar System are discernible.

which makes me feel like a scumbag ever time I do
which makes me feel like a scumbag every time I do

tried to get them to explain to me what was so exiting about this.
tried to get them to explain to me what was so exciting about this.

Software is a garden, ever generation must dig in and turn over the soil.
Software is a garden, every generation must dig in and turn over the soil.

I am going tobe in London in March
I am going to be in London in March

You'll note thay evil "Hollywood" kind of lay down on the oppression job
You'll note that evil "Hollywood" kind of lay down on the oppression job

I must confess to having come Cherryh's oeuvre in a wierd direction.
I must confess to having come Cherryh's oeuvre in a weird direction.

a stunning character study of someone who shouldn't be synmpathetic but is.
a stunning character study of someone who shouldn't be sympathetic but is.

Also, I need to point out that Tolkien is in his introduction introducing a non-existant literary work.
Also, I need to point out that Tolkien is in his introduction introducing a non-existent literary work.

The country in which I lived in chidhood was being shabbily destroyed before I was ten
The country in which I lived in childhood was being shabbily destroyed before I was ten

A New Critic reading LOTR would ignore Tolkien's experiences in WWI as they relate to the book, for example, anf probably also his Christianity, his Mediavalist perspective
A New Critic reading LOTR would ignore Tolkien's experiences in WWI as they relate to the book, for example, and probably also his Christianity, his Mediaevalist perspective

it did it's work of moving deeper from that for him just the way it's supposed to.
it did its work of moving deeper from that for him just the way it's supposed to.

The Spirt movie that never was
The Spirit movie that never was

Sure, and futher, doesn't go out of his way to pander
Sure, and further, doesn't go out of his way to pander

This chapter also has a inn scene after the opening scene
This chapter also has an inn scene after the opening scene

I've rarely dissagreed with any stylistic criticism of LOTR
I've rarely disagreed with any stylistic criticism of LOTR

The Nine had already faded an existed in spirit world
The Nine had already faded and existed in spirit world

But Sigler does a good job making your root for the protagonists
But Sigler does a good job making you root for the protagonists

I dont know about antwhere else but here in L.A. no one is covering this story
I don't know about anywhere else but here in L.A. no one is covering this story

sets cops in there place.
sets cops in their place.

People Put to much enfasis on Destroying property
People Put too much emphasis on Destroying property

but rioting ans smashing innocent people's cars and businesses is never the answer to problems.
but rioting and smashing innocent people's cars and businesses is never the answer to problems.

yet still leves the Hobbits to their own devices. 
yet still leaves the Hobbits to their own devices. 

Software langages are complex for a reason.
Software languages are complex for a reason.

if you take a particular langauge and you intersect or union with another language, or simply complement the language, do you get another language in the same class
if you take a particular language and you intersect or union with another language, or simply complement the language, do you get another language in the same class

Tomcat context.xml files, is there a hiearchy?
Tomcat context.xml files, is there a hierarchy?

It's a small app, not an enterprise application mantained by 100 people.
It's a small app, not an enterprise application maintained by 100 people.

It will work for some peoplle and not others.
It will work for some people and not others.

it movies don't suffer the same fate as CD's did.
if movies don't suffer the same fate as CD's did.

tryign to speak Freench
trying to speak French

Invitation, but it's a big noissy party.
Invitation, but it's a big noisy party.

how about I work the keyboard for some investications
how about I work the keyboard for some investigations

instead of checkign for error??
instead of checking for error?

Waht again are you thinking is happening? 
What again are you thinking is happening? 

A flag, fo course.
A flag, of course.

I th8ink it was an exception
I think it was an exception

So I could start N machines and they could wo9rk oon image analysis
So I could start N machines and they could work on image analysis

I don't know if it's germain just this instant.
I don't know if it's germane just this instant.

This was after an exceptinn that bobmed out the run
This was after an exceptinn that bombed out the run

Coudl be better but it does retry etc.
Could be better but it does retry etc.

UI wish there was an easy way to get thew workers to do an svn update.
I wish there was an easy way to get the workers to do an svn update.

He made laods of money shorting the GBP.
He made loads of money shorting the GBP.

But he's quiee full of himseeelf.
But he's quite full of himself.

Whatever youthink makes best sense
Whatever you think makes best sense

I really like the first bulletted item too. 
I really like the first bulleted item too. 

Thye old "bulleting board"
The old "bulletin board"

What will we end up needinng?
What will we end up needing?

Then you can taylor an index for such queries and thus avoid scanning much of the content.
Then you can tailor an index for such queries and thus avoid scanning much of the content.

Prepearing for sunrise
Preparing for sunrise

And when you enter into the state of marriage, its a given that your in a constant state of Love.
And when you enter into the state of marriage, it's a given that you're in a constant state of Love.

if the Pre can not compete in terms of price, it will not fair well.
if the Pre can not compete in terms of price, it will not fare well.

How much a static method will hurt from a testing point of view depends on where it is in you application call graph.
How much a static method will hurt from a testing point of view depends on where it is in your application call graph.

For each word we need to find all of its occurances in the text
For each word we need to find all of its occurrences in the text

not only is it’s solution convenient, it is fast!
not only is its solution convenient, it is fast!

All these techniques emphasise that self-observation it to be passive and non-judgemental.
All these techniques emphasise that self-observation is to be passive and non-judgemental.

if you want a ton of space and don't want too spend too much for it
if you want a ton of space and don't want to spend too much for it

could be purely statistical fluxuations
could be purely statistical fluctuations

the Marquis of Queensbury left the famous "somdomite" card for Oscar Wilde
the Marquis of Queensbury left the famous "sodomite" card for Oscar Wilde

Old crytpo products in Bletchley Park
Old crypto products in Bletchley Park

going back to the origibal source
going back to the original source

you cna express some remorse
you can express some remorse

if you jsut want something quick
if you just want something quick

Not even for mementary satidafdaction
Not even for momentary satisfaction

I'm really hoping that they come out with a toy in which the kids can play "interregator".
I'm really hoping that they come out with a toy in which the kids can play "interrogator".

I am holding out for the release of the Guantanemo Playset.
I am holding out for the release of the Guantanamo Playset.

Excuse me sir, but you have been 'randomnly' selected for additional scans.
Excuse me sir, but you have been 'randomly' selected for additional scans.

a lieing little Nazi turd
a lying little Nazi turd

The real issue is how the intelligence behaves at it's edges.
The real issue is how the intelligence behaves at its edges.

you become dependant on the single vendor
you become dependent on the single vendor

The risk of a nationwide decline in house prices was estiamted at 0 by S&P
The risk of a nationwide decline in house prices was estimated at 0 by S&P

This end of systematic miss-estimation of risk is not on your list.
This end of systematic mis-estimation of risk is not on your list.

the collapse of global financial asset values over the past year and a half was overwhelmingly do to increases in the risk and information discounts
the collapse of global financial asset values over the past year and a half was overwhelmingly due to increases in the risk and information discounts

the views of those who participate in financial markets are extraordinarily more volatile than can be generated by the variation in rational expectations of future growth rates and appropriate fundametnal discounts.
the views of those who participate in financial markets are extraordinarily more volatile than can be generated by the variation in rational expectations of future growth rates and appropriate fundamental discounts.

"Blacks are only angry when a cop kills one of there own."
"Blacks are only angry when a cop kills one of their own."

I expect we'll soon be hearing explanations like "the gun summoned itself to the officers waist, unholstered itself and discharged."
I expect we'll soon be hearing explanations like "the gun summoned itself to the officer's waist, unholstered itself and discharged."

Via the awesome Dave Weigel, we see the PUMAS are alive and well, and competing for Hillary Clintons seat.
Via the awesome Dave Weigel, we see the PUMAS are alive and well, and competing for Hillary Clinton's seat.

Harry Reid needs to take his baby moms advice.
Harry Reid needs to take his baby mom's advice.

I know that ya'll are more than cotillions and Martha's Vineyard
I know that y'all are more than cotillions and Martha's Vineyard

This meant that insects could grow much larger than they are today withought needing to invest resources in lungs
This meant that insects could grow much larger than they are today without needing to invest resources in lungs

I'm personnally grateful.
I'm personally grateful.

What the reduce phase recieves as input for a particular intermediate key (i.e., question), is simply all the information relevant to that question
What the reduce phase receives as input for a particular intermediate key (i.e., question), is simply all the information relevant to that question

progmatically start moving a form
programmatically start moving a form

Analyse python list with algorithm for counting occurences over date ranges
Analyse python list with algorithm for counting occurrences over date ranges

Does Python really follow its philosophy of “Readibility Counts”?
Does Python really follow its philosophy of “Readability Counts”?

Its obviously not possible to see what instance variable was defined where
It's obviously not possible to see what instance variable was defined where

I had a pretty good handle on exacly how long (in nanoseconds or microseconds) each instruction took to execute.
I had a pretty good handle on exactly how long (in nanoseconds or microseconds) each instruction took to execute.

With 16 registers, and paramaters passed in registers, you can quit worrying about registers.
With 16 registers, and parameters passed in registers, you can quit worrying about registers.

We were working with a fairly early version of Rationale rose for Windows
We were working with a fairly early version of Rational rose for Windows

I think the main reason is that too few developers now OCaml.
I think the main reason is that too few developers know OCaml.

Dryad runs the application by executing the vertices of this graph on a set of available computers, communicating as appropriate through flies, TCP pipes, and shared-memory FIFOs
Dryad runs the application by executing the vertices of this graph on a set of available computers, communicating as appropriate through files, TCP pipes, and shared-memory FIFOs

If you dont find things like the mating patterns of gibbons and the effects of diet on social structure interesting, this is probably the wrong book for you.
If you don't find things like the mating patterns of gibbons and the effects of diet on social structure interesting, this is probably the wrong book for you.

minimize the Shannon entropy under the constrant that only positive values are nonzero.
minimize the Shannon entropy under the constraint that only positive values are nonzero.

In my naivity
In my naivete

Because it let's S_ and I talk about his homework
Because it lets S_ and I talk about his homework

Design by contract/C# 4.0/avoidng ArgumentNullException
Design by contract/C# 4.0/avoiding ArgumentNullException

There are several variants in existance from early 1990s. 
There are several variants in existence from early 1990s. 

it's simply by virtue of the metaphore they use.
it's simply by virtue of the metaphor they use.

VPL's are reall a niche interest
VPL's are really a niche interest

I honestly thing encrypting/decrypting query string data is a bad approach to this problem.
I honestly think encrypting/decrypting query string data is a bad approach to this problem.

the cases where dedicated leasing or AWS doesn't make sense are fewer and fewer for bootstrapers.
the cases where dedicated leasing or AWS doesn't make sense are fewer and fewer for bootstrappers.

which are expensive to provide becuase it's the high-end anyway
which are expensive to provide because it's the high-end anyway

In other words it's the same reason why Apple charges a lot of moeny for 4Gb RAM
In other words it's the same reason why Apple charges a lot of money for 4Gb RAM

I had a plastic ukelele when I was a little kid.
I had a plastic ukulele when I was a little kid.

Python One Varible to Two
Python One Variable to Two

lets say we have this
let's say we have this

it might have error based on it's representation
it might have error based on its representation

Of course its better to have a good name right from the start.
Of course it's better to have a good name right from the start.

the language doesn't provide any syntatic sugar to organize his relationship for you
the language doesn't provide any syntactic sugar to organize his relationship for you

You're tests are very close to the source code.
Your tests are very close to the source code.

we might set up a days worth of transactions
we might set up a day's worth of transactions

You're at a much higher level than unit tests, usually at a vantage point where you can test all the applications business rules at once.
You're at a much higher level than unit tests, usually at a vantage point where you can test all the application's business rules at once.

If that doesn't developes a good API, it's almost useless.
If that doesn't develop a good API, it's almost useless.

Is there any way to interpret Greg Mankiw's Sunday New Yotk Times other than as an elbow to Chtistie's ribs while he thinks the ref's eye is elsewhere?
Is there any way to interpret Greg Mankiw's Sunday New York Times other than as an elbow to Christie's ribs while he thinks the ref's eye is elsewhere?

Here, if people dont' work, they're going to end up homeless.
Here, if people don't work, they're going to end up homeless.

the Bad guys are singing "Dress Rehersal Rag."
the Bad guys are singing "Dress Rehearsal Rag."

I some what understand this but, all poems have more then 1 explanation!
I somewhat understand this but, all poems have more then 1 explanation!

I guess tht must have  been an unauthorised version!
I guess that must have  been an unauthorised version!

Taxanomy of various dashboards can be more exhaustive.
Taxonomy of various dashboards can be more exhaustive.

I'll push them apart by their minimum translation distance (MTD) which seperates them.
I'll push them apart by their minimum translation distance (MTD) which separates them.

We could wind up with a world with elments of GATTACA
We could wind up with a world with elements of GATTACA

i know the hard part will be undertanding the algorithm and the decitions
i know the hard part will be undertanding the algorithm and the decisions

Consider finding the maximum termperature over the last day
Consider finding the maximum temperature over the last day

Discussion of my proposal led to the ressurection of PEP 289 for generator comprehensions
Discussion of my proposal led to the resurrection of PEP 289 for generator comprehensions

Imlpementing IRC Servers
Implementing IRC Servers

The abstact is not available.
The abstract is not available.

the few tattoos that I did have access two didn't really impress me
the few tattoos that I did have access to didn't really impress me

Also, when you were closer, you would see parts of the script, but then loose the phrase.
Also, when you were closer, you would see parts of the script, but then lose the phrase.

The forms are explorable and the act of exploring exposes all of the relavent user cases tests to the user,
The forms are explorable and the act of exploring exposes all of the relevant user cases tests to the user,

it is perfectly possible for someone to learn with out any physical school or personal interaction
it is perfectly possible for someone to learn without any physical school or personal interaction

and which would tell us a lot about whether it was given on terms that hold any real hope of every getting the money back.
and which would tell us a lot about whether it was given on terms that hold any real hope of ever getting the money back.

they woulnd't have joined a mercenary group if they did.
they wouldn't have joined a mercenary group if they did.

One of the engineers slashes a plastic shiv toward Coproral Lundi.
One of the engineers slashes a plastic shiv toward Corporal Lundi.

I suspect this trait is inherited in languages that claim Fortran as a forebare.
I suspect this trait is inherited in languages that claim Fortran as a forebear.

the principle purpose of match is to provide a mechanism for the move operator to use to get the elements of one field to another
the principal purpose of match is to provide a mechanism for the move operator to use to get the elements of one field to another

he video of the German weatherman amd the cat
he video of the German weatherman and the cat

I do agree that it is likely to yeild one less to synchronized catastrophic implosions
I do agree that it is likely to yield one less to synchronized catastrophic implosions

The dragon wakes up and realizes that a piece of his treasure horde has been stolen.
The dragon wakes up and realizes that a piece of his treasure hoard has been stolen.

No beliefs or ideoligies can be real.
No beliefs or ideologies can be real.

The central technique is seraching the space of proofs in Hoare logic of the desired specification
The central technique is searching the space of proofs in Hoare logic of the desired specification

They describe it's application to some small examples that involve synthesis of loops.
They describe its application to some small examples that involve synthesis of loops.

He then donned his parachuted and jumped out of the plane
He then donned his parachute and jumped out of the plane

The modern Ametican liberal economist's view of libertarianism is much the same
The modern American liberal economist's view of libertarianism is much the same

has it ever struck anyone here how inadequate the metaphore of "language" is for representing a computation, or a program?
has it ever struck anyone here how inadequate the metaphor of "language" is for representing a computation, or a program?

Although the concept of declarative programming existed before 1980 (see this paper from 1975), it's invention took place with the introduction of Haskell in 1990.
Although the concept of declarative programming existed before 1980 (see this paper from 1975), its invention took place with the introduction of Haskell in 1990.

I see tags as a way to categorize questions, and I dotn see how that tag helps to categorize anything.
I see tags as a way to categorize questions, and I don't see how that tag helps to categorize anything.

But when I wrote this I found it much easier to understand because I was riting it in Smalltalk.
But when I wrote this I found it much easier to understand because I was writing it in Smalltalk.

We need to arrange that whever he or she accesses a context it hides its spose and always pretends to be single, whether we read or write it.
We need to arrange that whever he or she accesses a context it hides its spouse and always pretends to be single, whether we read or write it.

The key in this scheme is to intercept all access to context instace variables and forward the access to the spouse if married.
The key in this scheme is to intercept all access to context instance variables and forward the access to the spouse if married.

There’s not much difficulty grabae collecitng references frm stack pages.
There’s not much difficulty garbage collecting references from stack pages.

The StackInterpreter is substantially faster for activastion/return benchmarks and insubstantially slower for process switch benchmarks.
The StackInterpreter is substantially faster for activation/return benchmarks and insubstantially slower for process switch benchmarks.

The overhead of bytyecode dispatch shows where we have to go next.
The overhead of bytecode dispatch shows where we have to go next.

along with in-line cacheing techniques
along with in-line caching techniques

He was this 59 year old guy who lived a lone in the home he grew up in.
He was this 59 year old guy who lived alone in the home he grew up in.

As a batchelor in his home, it grew into a state of messiness that is common for college kids and me on busy weeks.
As a bachelor in his home, it grew into a state of messiness that is common for college kids and me on busy weeks.

If there reported actions are true, deliberately letting him die and palnning the cover up as he lay there dying, then to my mind that should clearly be a murder charge.
If their reported actions are true, deliberately letting him die and planning the cover up as he lay there dying, then to my mind that should clearly be a murder charge.

Had the vitim been a middle class solicitor i suspect the charges would be more serious.
Had the victim been a middle class solicitor i suspect the charges would be more serious.

The scary question for me is how many other vulnerable people who didn't happen to have their phone line connected to the operator have their been.
The scary question for me is how many other vulnerable people who didn't happen to have their phone line connected to the operator have there been.

After my recpvery, I was sure to contact the fire department to file a complaint against those paramedics. 
After my recovery, I was sure to contact the fire department to file a complaint against those paramedics. 

I have a severley disabled son who was denied pain medication in a hospital because he couldn't express how much pain he was in to anyone but me. 
I have a severely disabled son who was denied pain medication in a hospital because he couldn't express how much pain he was in to anyone but me. 

Obama suggests checking out volunteer opportunitites
Obama suggests checking out volunteer opportunities

but if it were codefied that one or the other was the aim of incarceration then at least there would be a potential for time served to have a goal
but if it were codified that one or the other was the aim of incarceration then at least there would be a potential for time served to have a goal

gnus email/news-reader already provides, such a fature via scoring.
gnus email/news-reader already provides, such a feature via scoring.

many 3.0 features have actually been backporte to 2.6
many 3.0 features have actually been backported to 2.6

Long time reader, first time commentor.
Long time reader, first time commenter.

Why do I want to know what signficance life has beyond what I can observe?
Why do I want to know what significance life has beyond what I can observe?

Fortunatetly, though, they don't make a big deal about the fact they're hiding it.
Fortunately, though, they don't make a big deal about the fact they're hiding it.

As for bit of speculation on my part difficultly in picking a programming language or naturally written languages depends on how irregular it is.
As for bit of speculation on my part difficulty in picking a programming language or naturally written languages depends on how irregular it is.

But in my architecture bytecoded metods play a central role. I’l explain in a subsequent post but I intend that the adaptive optimization incarnation of Cog will be implemented entirely in btecode.
But in my architecture bytecoded methods play a central role. I’l explain in a subsequent post but I intend that the adaptive optimization incarnation of Cog will be implemented entirely in bytecode.

I think an in-image native code compiler temps the system implementor with the prospect of high-performance
I think an in-image native code compiler tempts the system implementor with the prospect of high-performance

Facebook continues it's fast growth and a few other social networks stop growing and go on the decline.
Facebook continues its fast growth and a few other social networks stop growing and go on the decline.

imprisoned in the labyrinth of the number-crunching Minataur.
imprisoned in the labyrinth of the number-crunching Minotaur.

and hasa lot of genes packed on it
and has a lot of genes packed on it

This unique book has it's good points. It attmepts to show how to use different types of statistical analyses work together and what order to use them in.
This unique book has its good points. It attempts to show how to use different types of statistical analyses work together and what order to use them in.

This makes for a slow and aggrevating read to the neophyte.
This makes for a slow and aggravating read to the neophyte.

Reenforcement is necessary when learning a new language
Reinforcement is necessary when learning a new language

General principles of sampling and experimentation are licidly covered
General principles of sampling and experimentation are lucidly covered

This is still my favorite introductory statistics book, it is unique and inciteful
This is still my favorite introductory statistics book, it is unique and insightful

and active learning methods for tesching statistics at the elementary, middle and high school levels
and active learning methods for teaching statistics at the elementary, middle and high school levels

Beautiful, simply beautuful!
Beautiful, simply beautiful!

Art of Community (a forthcomming book by Ubuntu community manager, also on-line)
Art of Community (a forthcoming book by Ubuntu community manager, also on-line)

video get's fun at 0:45
video gets fun at 0:45

Her principle objection to detainee abuse is not ephemeral or spiritual
Her principal objection to detainee abuse is not ephemeral or spiritual

As a side note, I onder why Newgrounds faded out of popularity.
As a side note, I wonder why Newgrounds faded out of popularity.

It's goal is to use the eschatalogical horror of the Mythos
Its goal is to use the eschatological horror of the Mythos

all science since Aristotle including meteorology, semeiotics, education, epistemology, fashion and arithmetic
all science since Aristotle including meteorology, semiotics, education, epistemology, fashion and arithmetic

it's not an imperssionation, or an interpretation.
it's not an impersonation, or an interpretation.

shes got such a unique tone to her voice. and shes so preety.
she's got such a unique tone to her voice. and she's so pretty.

Alogorithms, operating systems and finally some coding in Java
Algorithms, operating systems and finally some coding in Java

I hate it when people talk to long.
I hate it when people talk too long.

The explanations of theorums and formulas are just not enough.
The explanations of theorems and formulas are just not enough.

I couldn't understand thw way the author presented a problem
I couldn't understand the way the author presented a problem

The style of the auther is very nice.
The style of the author is very nice.

I'm definately keeping it!
I'm definitely keeping it!

Voldemort combines in memory caching with the storage system so that a separete caching layer is not required
Voldemort combines in memory caching with the storage system so that a separate caching layer is not required

Data partioning is transparent
Data partitioning is transparent

Data replication and placement is decided by a simple API to be able to accomadate a wide range of application specific strategies
Data replication and placement is decided by a simple API to be able to accommodate a wide range of application specific strategies

Einstein merely stated that perhaps the two men could talk to eachother after Gunther's recovery.
Einstein merely stated that perhaps the two men could talk to each other after Gunther's recovery.

sudden epilectic seizures in people without a history of epilepsy
sudden epileptic seizures in people without a history of epilepsy

I'm not really sure how serious a brain tumor inherantly is.
I'm not really sure how serious a brain tumor inherently is.

Apparently, intercranial hypertension is something that its Wikipedia article does not actually explain
Apparently, intracranial hypertension is something that its Wikipedia article does not actually explain

You menioned a prognosis of months.
You mentioned a prognosis of months.

CT scan of brain showing a breast cancer metastatized to the left parietal lobe in the peri-ventricular area.
CT scan of brain showing a breast cancer metastasized to the left parietal lobe in the peri-ventricular area.

There is a photo of breat cancer instead of brain cancer.
There is a photo of breast cancer instead of brain cancer.

Whether surgery has any beneficial efect in slowing down anaplastic degeneration and extending survival time is far from being proven.
Whether surgery has any beneficial effect in slowing down anaplastic degeneration and extending survival time is far from being proven.

The author also implies that Gunther Jr.'s idea wasn't unique, but had also been preoposed by a few other scientists of the time.
The author also implies that Gunther Jr.'s idea wasn't unique, but had also been proposed by a few other scientists of the time.

The big articles are pretty intimidating somtimes.
The big articles are pretty intimidating sometimes.

Brain tumors are not a joke, some are life threating or a death sentence.
Brain tumors are not a joke, some are life threatening or a death sentence.

We have about 40 hours of video of brain tumor subjects, many original articles as well as a database of treatent options.
We have about 40 hours of video of brain tumor subjects, many original articles as well as a database of treatment options.

I think I saw some expressions of this perspectiv in the disagreement discussion you had with Eliezer.
I think I saw some expressions of this perspective in the disagreement discussion you had with Eliezer.

And that is not fun, even if surpising.
And that is not fun, even if surprising.

This beats any possible pleasant surpise that might be there.
This beats any possible pleasant surprise that might be there.

the whole briefcase-handcuffed-to-the-wrist thing with the only keys at the palce he was going from and the place he was going to.
the whole briefcase-handcuffed-to-the-wrist thing with the only keys at the place he was going from and the place he was going to.

He's one of the few people who can legitimatly point at the internet and say "I made that".
He's one of the few people who can legitimately point at the internet and say "I made that".

Remember that Zimbabwe redemoninated in mid 2008
Remember that Zimbabwe redenominated in mid 2008

python code for a simple double-entry accounting sheme
python code for a simple double-entry accounting scheme

A simple stackfull coroutine implementation
A simple stackful coroutine implementation

Now, interatively rebase the current commit series, starting at the parent of the commit you want to split
Now, interactively rebase the current commit series, starting at the parent of the commit you want to split

He proposed tighter regulation of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, the now-nationalised mortagage agencies.
He proposed tighter regulation of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, the now-nationalised mortgage agencies.

Wvolutionary psychology is tricky stuff
Evolutionary psychology is tricky stuff

I thought I was looking more for an algorithm that looked at the words, and did a match-seach-match type of approach.
I thought I was looking more for an algorithm that looked at the words, and did a match-search-match type of approach.

"150 lines of if-else statements", that's to complex in itself.
"150 lines of if-else statements", that's too complex in itself.

priorities are differnt
priorities are different

We can wait for the official report on the shots fired but the earlier parts of those amatuer videos are also chilling for the hate-filled crowd reactions to what was, prior to the gunshot, a routine police encounter.
We can wait for the official report on the shots fired but the earlier parts of those amateur videos are also chilling for the hate-filled crowd reactions to what was, prior to the gunshot, a routine police encounter.

Infratructure loans were granted on the condition that engineering and construction companies from our own country must build all these projects.
Infrastructure loans were granted on the condition that engineering and construction companies from our own country must build all these projects.

One of the languages I'm building requires the ability to filter through code seperately before tokenizing
One of the languages I'm building requires the ability to filter through code separately before tokenizing

Of course, that's massively ineffecient.
Of course, that's massively inefficient.

Make you robot not die to the other robot.
Make your robot not die to the other robot.

Brilliant in it's full meaning!
Brilliant in its full meaning!

i think i am gonna wach ot over and over and over !!!
i think i am gonna watch it over and over and over !!!

I love Sid Ceasar he is one of my meny favorites.
I love Sid Caesar he is one of my many favorites.

and how a sensitive and witty commedian can show that inner drama
and how a sensitive and witty comedian can show that inner drama

but the vids sickk!!!
but the vid's sick!!!

its like from the fiftys!
it's like from the fifties!

Sid Caeser?
Sid Caesar?

nice and funny wonder what happend next ...
nice and funny wonder what happened next ...

here they prove their inate musicality and timing.
here they prove their innate musicality and timing.

Beatiful symphony, but this movie disspoint me..
Beautiful symphony, but this movie disappoint me..

inverting the color pallet to produce a light background for dark images
inverting the color palette to produce a light background for dark images

If your part of the organization keeps losing it's managers.
If your part of the organization keeps losing its managers.

When two new consultants called the "Bobs" show up to help make things more effecient.
When two new consultants called the "Bobs" show up to help make things more efficient.

Especially if your a contractor :)
Especially if you're a contractor :)

I've been layed off once and worked for two companies that went under.
I've been laid off once and worked for two companies that went under.

you may be getting layed off if...
you may be getting laid off if...

GOTO 1, but with tasks that are incrementally unapalatable
GOTO 1, but with tasks that are incrementally unpalatable

To the companies credit:
To the company's credit:

This is a classic book, and one of the few books in existance that covers interactive BASIC compilers.
This is a classic book, and one of the few books in existence that covers interactive BASIC compilers.

Only the chapter on parsing is noticably dated.
Only the chapter on parsing is noticeably dated.

Can anyone please recommend any library or any othe way to do this?
Can anyone please recommend any library or any other way to do this?

I'm looking to write an interactive fiction à la Zork, but with my own sillyness...
I'm looking to write an interactive fiction à la Zork, but with my own silliness...

what are the tools and langage existing to do that, and what are there features and advantages between them ?
what are the tools and language existing to do that, and what are their features and advantages between them ?

to not get bogged down in the sme set of technologies
to not get bogged down in the same set of technologies

All software systems are now to complicated for a single person to understand
All software systems are now too complicated for a single person to understand

Commentry from Garth Gilmore:
Commentary from Garth Gilmore:

to see small examples of python code people have written that in some way clashes with the generally preffered way of doing things.
to see small examples of python code people have written that in some way clashes with the generally preferred way of doing things.

because then the proteced fields and a whole lot of implementation details implicitly become part of the API contract
because then the protected fields and a whole lot of implementation details implicitly become part of the API contract

Stroud is a legend, this man could single handily bring world piece in a simple 46-stage process.
Stroud is a legend, this man could singlehandedly bring world peace in a simple 46-stage process.

Hamming is a famous name in applied mathematics and electical engineering
Hamming is a famous name in applied mathematics and electrical engineering

they are supposed to hire some professional programmers to design a beatiful architecture
they are supposed to hire some professional programmers to design a beautiful architecture

The real progess in this field will come when the problems are formulated more by what is needed
The real progress in this field will come when the problems are formulated more by what is needed

Great wish it had more n option inverse problems
Great wish it had more on option inverse problems

The excercises don't take away the impression that holes are left in the text.
The exercises don't take away the impression that holes are left in the text.

Dr. Jaynes is a true Baysian.
Dr. Jaynes is a true Bayesian.

The Bayesian concept of probability is epistomological
The Bayesian concept of probability is epistemological

The beauty is that probabiltity distributions integrate the two seamlessly.
The beauty is that probability distributions integrate the two seamlessly.

Thus, it is perfectly valid to put a distribution on an unknown parameter, epistomologically unknown
Thus, it is perfectly valid to put a distribution on an unknown parameter, epistemologically unknown

His background as a physicist is key to understanding some of the esoteric philisophical points.
His background as a physicist is key to understanding some of the esoteric philosophical points.

Excelent
Excellent

It is a book between phylosophy and statistic.
It is a book between philosophy and statistics.

A nic book on the philosophy of Bayesian probability theory.
A nice book on the philosophy of Bayesian probability theory.

Deductive, Aristotlean logic, it turns out
Deductive, Aristotelean logic, it turns out

If you're drowning in a flood of epistomelogical doubt
If you're drowning in a flood of epistemological doubt

The author's warnings regarding the mind projection fallacy and the paradoxes associated with infinite point sets alone is worth the cost of this extroadinary work.
The author's warnings regarding the mind projection fallacy and the paradoxes associated with infinite point sets alone is worth the cost of this extraordinary work.

Keynes complemented his interval approximation approach to decision making by systematically constucting a conventional coefficient of risk
Keynes complemented his interval approximation approach to decision making by systematically constructing a conventional coefficient of risk

Keynes's approach explains and gives solutions for all of the socalled paradoxes of decision theory.
Keynes's approach explains and gives solutions for all of the so-called paradoxes of decision theory.

A pair is a thing that cares for it's values and refers to them whatever may happen.
A pair is a thing that cares for its values and refers to them whatever may happen.

May the newly constructed object have a long lifetime and it's references be many.
May the newly constructed object have a long lifetime and its references be many.

it will certainly find it’s way into my teaching
it will certainly find its way into my teaching

I htink if its complicated that it needs explanation, it should be refactored to be simpler
I think if its complicated that it needs explanation, it should be refactored to be simpler

document your code (pulic methods, purpose of classes, runtime behaviour, configuration)
document your code (public methods, purpose of classes, runtime behaviour, configuration)

Ultimately, the reward is greater when you take it as travel, rather then education.
Ultimately, the reward is greater when you take it as travel, rather than education.

It is a journey to change the course of you life.. professional & otherwise.
It is a journey to change the course of your life.. professional & otherwise.

generally the best parts were where he would tie an example into a well known design principal which would be explained in a sidebar
generally the best parts were where he would tie an example into a well known design principle which would be explained in a sidebar

IN ANOTHER SKILLET THAT’S SMALLER BUT NOT AS SMALL AS YOUR TINY FUCKING BRAIN WITH IT’S FIVE BRAIN CELLS TURN THE HEAT ON MEDIUM AND ADD LIKE A CUP AND A HALF OF WATER AND SOME OF THAT SAVORY FUCKING WORCESTERSHIRE SAUCE, SCOOBY-FUCKING-DOO.
IN ANOTHER SKILLET THAT’S SMALLER BUT NOT AS SMALL AS YOUR TINY FUCKING BRAIN WITH ITS FIVE BRAIN CELLS TURN THE HEAT ON MEDIUM AND ADD LIKE A CUP AND A HALF OF WATER AND SOME OF THAT SAVORY FUCKING WORCESTERSHIRE SAUCE, SCOOBY-FUCKING-DOO.

...direct from Fucking Cooking for Fucking Stupid Fuckng MotherFuckers by Samuel L. Jackson.
...direct from Fucking Cooking for Fucking Stupid Fucking MotherFuckers by Samuel L. Jackson.

Where its a significant or interesting piece of code used, I will probably refer to it in my write-up
Where it's a significant or interesting piece of code used, I will probably refer to it in my write-up

Where as if I've used an algorithm that someone clearly developed and put a lot of time into, that's something I would definitely reference.
Whereas if I've used an algorithm that someone clearly developed and put a lot of time into, that's something I would definitely reference.

If its published (book, journal, web, etc..) then you must always reference the original
If it's published (book, journal, web, etc..) then you must always reference the original

Having the class attributes accesible exactly the same way as object attributes
Having the class attributes accessible exactly the same way as object attributes

Descriptions of one particular disired/undisired feature.
Descriptions of one particular desired/undesired feature.

One adavantage of using Parrot is that it ships with tons of example languages
One advantage of using Parrot is that it ships with tons of example languages

grab their bowlers and walking sticks and perambu late the boulevards to see how people really live today.
grab their bowlers and walking sticks and perambulate the boulevards to see how people really live today.

This is a sentence that insists upon itself and at the same time points to the greater mysteries, as if there were some secret order determin ing every letter.
This is a sentence that insists upon itself and at the same time points to the greater mysteries, as if there were some secret order determining every letter.

A single nice sentinal factory (like _NoDefault in this example) would be nice, though.
A single nice sentinel factory (like _NoDefault in this example) would be nice, though.

"Lish Young Buy-a-Broom" and "Strayed Away" suffer from absolutely atrocious songwriting and extremly silly lyrics.
"Lish Young Buy-a-Broom" and "Strayed Away" suffer from absolutely atrocious songwriting and extremely silly lyrics.

I'm aware that software design is a very complex subject and that a pletora of books have been written about it
I'm aware that software design is a very complex subject and that a plethora of books have been written about it

However, I also see some softs of fiction, but particularly SF, triggering the opposite: geek mode.
However, I also see some sorts of fiction, but particularly SF, triggering the opposite: geek mode.

realize i'd never thought about it, had been assuming she was white, be horribly embarassed
realize i'd never thought about it, had been assuming she was white, be horribly embarrassed

Friday's Garfield turned that suspense into a fear of the variety that gets way to close to the reader.
Friday's Garfield turned that suspense into a fear of the variety that gets way too close to the reader.

Abstract the javascript code into a framework that lets you just pass in a heirarchical js array of definitions.
Abstract the javascript code into a framework that lets you just pass in a hierarchical js array of definitions.

Dampening the females passion, thus making her less likely to mate with another male.
Dampening the female's passion, thus making her less likely to mate with another male.

Its an area few people have explored, that I'm interested in.
It's an area few people have explored, that I'm interested in.

Anyway, Idea 2 I am definitely exited about
Anyway, Idea 2 I am definitely excited about

For developement, option 3 is too cumbersome.
For development, option 3 is too cumbersome.

Note: I used a naive bubble sort there, watchout.
Note: I used a naive bubble sort there, watch out.

modolu implementation flaws as all security-enforcing code is subject to
modulo implementation flaws as all security-enforcing code is subject to

Acutally I would be more than happy- elated even
Actually I would be more than happy- elated even

If there is some concensus that this is a good idea
If there is some consensus that this is a good idea

If you disalow it as most systems do
If you disallow it as most systems do

I wasn't dissapointed with my mistake though.
I wasn't disappointed with my mistake though.

if your carrying nitroglycerin, the correct answer to juggling is "no."
if you're carrying nitroglycerin, the correct answer to juggling is "no."

I'd like to know, as part of the research for my novel, just when motor veils when out of fashion
I'd like to know, as part of the research for my novel, just when motor veils went out of fashion

I was always the 'linux guy' in school/college, trying my best to use non-MS alternatives, just out of purse spite for the 'big corporation’ I guess.
I was always the 'linux guy' in school/college, trying my best to use non-MS alternatives, just out of pure spite for the 'big corporation’ I guess.

Desicions would get pushed around and I felt hugely disalussioned and ineffective.
Decisions would get pushed around and I felt hugely disilussioned and ineffective.

I cant stand light backgrounds, i prefer dark ones
I can't stand light backgrounds, i prefer dark ones

I assume that all externally accessible functions are declared in headers, and that this for of repetition is necessary
I assume that all externally accessible functions are declared in headers, and that this form of repetition is necessary

it makes me wonder whether we need a 'Refactorors Anonymous' group
it makes me wonder whether we need a 'Refactorers Anonymous' group

This got me into the habbit of asking myself continuously
This got me into the habit of asking myself continuously

As horrible as it is, this code does it's job, so it's best to just leave it alone.
As horrible as it is, this code does its job, so it's best to just leave it alone.

I have a thought applicable to that segement in terms of the relative power of the black riders as the story moves along 
I have a thought applicable to that segment in terms of the relative power of the black riders as the story moves along 

They had plenty of opportunity to observe at first hand what the ring did, and the effect it had on the ring barers. 
They had plenty of opportunity to observe at first hand what the ring did, and the effect it had on the ring bearers. 

White guy fights for naties.
White guy fights for natives.

I wait with baited breath for something about Japan that doesn't include geisha or ritual suicide.
I wait with bated breath for something about Japan that doesn't include geisha or ritual suicide.

At that point you can use F# on some projects, assess how you are doing, and consider whether you want to try Haskell lated.
At that point you can use F# on some projects, assess how you are doing, and consider whether you want to try Haskell later.

there's a lot of low hanging fruit for the entreprenaurs here.
there's a lot of low hanging fruit for the entrepreneurs here.

Most religious rituals (incense, rhytmic music, chanting
Most religious rituals (incense, rhythmic music, chanting

we don't get bored with something if it's only a mean to something else.
we don't get bored with something if it's only a means to something else.

Any foreign solider or intelligence agent, or any terrorist, who uses those techniques
Any foreign soldier or intelligence agent, or any terrorist, who uses those techniques

this sort of sketchy "Souther Italy? Very southern Italy?"
this sort of sketchy "Southern Italy? Very southern Italy?"

although may of their siblings don't
although many of their siblings don't

althugh
although

hey! you little peice of shit
hey! you little piece of shit

enumberate
enumerate

Is there a known pattern for scheduling events programatically?
Is there a known pattern for scheduling events programmatically?

I never did anything with it beyond experimenting, but it was defiantly a worthwhile exercise 
I never did anything with it beyond experimenting, but it was definitely a worthwhile exercise 

(nothing malicous off course)
(nothing malicious of course)

Signs of micromanagement, self-serving management or excessive focus on minutae of performance.
Signs of micromanagement, self-serving management or excessive focus on minutiae of performance.

I do not kow the current state of OpenGenera
I do not know the current state of OpenGenera

I realla wished they would have ported the stuff to x_64
I really wished they would have ported the stuff to x_64

Britons tremble lest the vengance of Heaven fall on your Isle
Britons tremble lest the vengeance of Heaven fall on your Isle

First of all, I do believe that a good spec document is important for any moderatly complex requirement
First of all, I do believe that a good spec document is important for any moderately complex requirement

Within economic theory there are defintely false statements such as those made by Mankiw and Fama.
Within economic theory there are definitely false statements such as those made by Mankiw and Fama.

And once that's punctured, your drowned in your own blood
And once that's punctured, you're drowned in your own blood

A programmer who consistently underestmates tasks doesn’t have a “problem” which be “solved” by multiplying by a factoring or reviewing estimates with peers or some other simplistic fix.
A programmer who consistently underestimates tasks doesn’t have a “problem” which be “solved” by multiplying by a factoring or reviewing estimates with peers or some other simplistic fix.

the transaction costs are less harsh so if your just in the market for a few years go with an index fund.
the transaction costs are less harsh so if you're just in the market for a few years go with an index fund.

keep zooming in all the way from galatical star systems right down to the molecule, atom, and sub-atomic particles
keep zooming in all the way from galactical star systems right down to the molecule, atom, and sub-atomic particles

Chopin, grate melodist, didn`t create no one leade
Chopin, great melodist, didn`t create no one leade

whaa, this is happy, didn't know beethoven whas happy
whaa, this is happy, didn't know beethoven was happy

probabely ur right ,because he was always trying to supress his feelings,either in music or life, back them up with reasoning and logestics!
probably ur right ,because he was always trying to suppress his feelings,either in music or life, back them up with reasoning and logistics!

Ture Love from Chocolate Voice with Touching Melody
True Love from Chocolate Voice with Touching Melody

And then I thank God its not McCain.
And then I thank God it's not McCain.

and here I was hoping for another of the non-election threads, talking about reasons to be cheerfull :)
and here I was hoping for another of the non-election threads, talking about reasons to be cheerful :)

the applicatuon would scan through the library
the application would scan through the library

the amount of unenglish that turns up in waffly technical documents is so absurd that people don't notice when others do it on purpose or for plagurism purposes:
the amount of unenglish that turns up in waffly technical documents is so absurd that people don't notice when others do it on purpose or for plagiarism purposes:

Is there anyway to modify the keyboard shortcuts in eclipse?
Is there any way to modify the keyboard shortcuts in eclipse?

like people who had completely bought into the propoganda
like people who had completely bought into the propaganda

Using staic vs. member find method on a STL set?
Using static vs. member find method on a STL set?

Design patters (especially the first chapters) is a good read
Design patterns (especially the first chapters) is a good read

Howerver I can not name any book which treats object-orientation negativly.
Howerver I can not name any book which treats object-orientation negatively.

However my recommodation would be looking at langauges beeing "pure-OO" as e.g Smalltalk
However my recommendation would be looking at languages being "pure-OO" as e.g Smalltalk

perhaps even preferable depsite the minor readability hit
perhaps even preferable despite the minor readability hit

call everyone I've been wanting to get together with and try to see them before nnext Wednesday
call everyone I've been wanting to get together with and try to see them before next Wednesday

I'm assuming you have some reasonable assumption around '@' not just 'showing up' independant of your token keys in the input.
I'm assuming you have some reasonable assumption around '@' not just 'showing up' independent of your token keys in the input.

And each of the code samples has a button to automaticaly push the code into the interactive evaluator.
And each of the code samples has a button to automatically push the code into the interactive evaluator.

Yes it is doable, and their gonna pay me $130,000 to start.
Yes it is doable, and they're gonna pay me $130,000 to start.

First, he algorithm contains several mistakes and leaves a lot unexplained.
First, the algorithm contains several mistakes and leaves a lot unexplained.

The fourth algorithm is Heapsort, to show that one would generally be better of using it in the first place.
The fourth algorithm is Heapsort, to show that one would generally be better off using it in the first place.

by acceptiong a quadratic worst case behaviour.
by accepting a quadratic worst case behaviour.

However if just some information is available it is usually not to hard to find a way of choosing a pivot element
However if just some information is available it is usually not too hard to find a way of choosing a pivot element

Predictible Fakers
Predictable Fakers

While its likely political processes can enact rules to prevent this housing crises from repeating itself in a similar manner, its less likely they can do so with future, unknown crises
While it's likely political processes can enact rules to prevent this housing crises from repeating itself in a similar manner, it's less likely they can do so with future, unknown crises

problem:i need to write a function that takes 4 bytes as input and performs a reversable linear trasnformation on this and resuklts it as 4 bytes.
problem:i need to write a function that takes 4 bytes as input and performs a reversible linear transformation on this and results it as 4 bytes.

but wait there is more it also hase to be distributive
but wait there is more it also has to be distributive

i have to search a graph of size 256^8 due to havign to search
i have to search a graph of size 256^8 due to having to search

making this solution nonsence...
making this solution nonsense...

there's a major problem--it's handling of shipping is seriously craptacular.
there's a major problem--its handling of shipping is seriously craptacular.

WordPress is INSANELY freindly for blogging and updates and stuff.
WordPress is INSANELY friendly for blogging and updates and stuff.

What's wrong with Holland that so many of their gradnmas spontaneously combust?
What's wrong with Holland that so many of their grandmas spontaneously combust?

It is bad enough that the probability of a paper being accepted at NIPS is monotonically decreasing in it’s quality.
It is bad enough that the probability of a paper being accepted at NIPS is monotonically decreasing in its quality.

At it’s most basic level, the assumption that research is zero-sum is flawed, because the process of research is not done in a closed system.
At its most basic level, the assumption that research is zero-sum is flawed, because the process of research is not done in a closed system.

Thus, if you offer today to sell me 100 barrels of oil at $40/barrel on Dec 31, 2009, you loose $1000 if on Dec 31 oil is worth $50/barrel.
Thus, if you offer today to sell me 100 barrels of oil at $40/barrel on Dec 31, 2009, you lose $1000 if on Dec 31 oil is worth $50/barrel.

 it has to be keyed off a 64*64 array of byte values that are sudo random but recreatable
 it has to be keyed off a 64*64 array of byte values that are pseudorandom but recreatable

as I mentionned, everything is refactored properly
as I mentioned, everything is refactored properly

Sounds to good to be true?
Sounds too good to be true?

How to find the process which is cosuming the most i/o in linux?
How to find the process which is consuming the most i/o in linux?

I've lost far to much data to delete statments like this over the years.
I've lost far too much data to delete statements like this over the years.

so the ISRs themselves were interruptable
so the ISRs themselves were interruptible

Its absolutely drives you nuts
It absolutely drives you nuts

I always like pouring over schemas that have been tested by heavy use
I always like poring over schemas that have been tested by heavy use

I guess my point is that mediawiki is a database, and that it's relations are not in the SQL - but in the wikitext.
I guess my point is that mediawiki is a database, and that its relations are not in the SQL - but in the wikitext.

While I certainly think this is a fair critique of some in the Repbulican party, consensus will only come about if Democrats include them in the discussion if the governing consensus is to succeed.
While I certainly think this is a fair critique of some in the Republican party, consensus will only come about if Democrats include them in the discussion if the governing consensus is to succeed.

Its just that now its about the words of a scientist rather than music or videos.
It's just that now it's about the words of a scientist rather than music or videos.

Like the author eluded to, you can end up worrying more about what you are capturing than actually remembering to enjoy yourself.
Like the author alluded to, you can end up worrying more about what you are capturing than actually remembering to enjoy yourself.

there’s always been in the fine print a clause exclusing US Government employees from having to transfer copyright
there’s always been in the fine print a clause excluding US Government employees from having to transfer copyright

That is, also, a auestion.
That is, also, a question.

Unfortunately I never had the chance to take a compiler design course or anything like that in Unviersity
Unfortunately I never had the chance to take a compiler design course or anything like that in University

This is very intersting
This is very interesting

the guy works his ass off every day and does a pretty damn good job at what he dose.
the guy works his ass off every day and does a pretty damn good job at what he does.

Could you list a code example of what your thinking currently?
Could you list a code example of what you're thinking currently?

lazyweb please make me a tool that let's me find people to follow... 
lazyweb please make me a tool that lets me find people to follow... 

Hard too use without documentation
Hard to use without documentation

For emotional, religious, and even poiltical effect
For emotional, religious, and even political effect

It was, for all that, quite clean and elegant, without a hint of dirt or ordor
It was, for all that, quite clean and elegant, without a hint of dirt or odor

It used to be practically a requiremnt for the job to have killed someone
It used to be practically a requirement for the job to have killed someone

The ludite bias is used (correctly)
The luddite bias is used (correctly)

in the face of an environment superinelligently optimized to change our values, it probably just isn't so
in the face of an environment superintelligently optimized to change our values, it probably just isn't so

Ion storm failued due to lack of focus
Ion storm failed due to lack of focus

if you put that on a pedestal, you will deephasise where all the real work needs to be done.
if you put that on a pedestal, you will deemphasise where all the real work needs to be done.

I found that in the end it's goes nowhere if the effort was not applied toward a consistent goal.
I found that in the end it goes nowhere if the effort was not applied toward a consistent goal.

Source code for 'em' (including Ken Thompson's origianl code for 'ed') and accompanying documentation files.
Source code for 'em' (including Ken Thompson's original code for 'ed') and accompanying documentation files.

Actually its's the other way round
Actually it's the other way round

For the cicadias.
For the cicadas.

Losers as big as the outgoing President only come along once in a lifetime, and I speak for many, many, many prominant and influential Americans when I say how proud I am to have cowered before him for the past eight years.
Losers as big as the outgoing President only come along once in a lifetime, and I speak for many, many, many prominent and influential Americans when I say how proud I am to have cowered before him for the past eight years.

I am finding Xandros for Eee PC unchallenging, and it's advance mode has sent the wordprocessor into crashing regularly
I am finding Xandros for Eee PC unchallenging, and its advance mode has sent the wordprocessor into crashing regularly

Sarah Palin bristoled at the treatment she had received compared to Ms Kennedy.
Sarah Palin bristled at the treatment she had received compared to Ms Kennedy.

To complte the constuction process, roll the sausage forward completely wrapping it in the bacon weave.
To complete the construction process, roll the sausage forward completely wrapping it in the bacon weave.

Now that you’re pork is well seasoned, it’s time to add more pork.
Now that your pork is well seasoned, it’s time to add more pork.

Probably non-flashy, inglamorous things like numbers of terrorist attacks/month in Iraq
Probably non-flashy, unglamorous things like numbers of terrorist attacks/month in Iraq

but that's more of a time committment thing.
but that's more of a time commitment thing.

Science, particularly its academic version, never liked negative results, let alone the statement and advertizing of its own limits
Science, particularly its academic version, never liked negative results, let alone the statement and advertising of its own limits

This demographic transition toward healthy survival will improve productivity, lower medial costs, and enhance quality of life.
This demographic transition toward healthy survival will improve productivity, lower medical costs, and enhance quality of life.

a low-level background intelligence that permeates the technium, and trough this saturation morphs it.
a low-level background intelligence that permeates the technium, and through this saturation morphs it.

whether human and nonhuman intelligences are distinctly separate or whether a measureable gradient exists
whether human and nonhuman intelligences are distinctly separate or whether a measurable gradient exists

We are delighted that our hostel have hot water and complientary tea/coffee
We are delighted that our hostel have hot water and complimentary tea/coffee

It will make you sweat buckets and will take every last musle in your legs help you pedal
It will make you sweat buckets and will take every last muscle in your legs help you pedal

Its climb after climb with cars and mototbikes sometimes struggling to cope
It's climb after climb with cars and motorbikes sometimes struggling to cope

Its literally a case of coming down hills to go up mountains
It's literally a case of coming down hills to go up mountains

After getting our Love Shack for a bargin price we head straight for a refreshing beverage and of course the springs themselves
After getting our Love Shack for a bargain price we head straight for a refreshing beverage and of course the springs themselves

Everyone seems to bath here though
Everyone seems to bathe here though

I know....its early but.....
I know....it's early but.....

Well, that helps explain why most humans mistakely believe that consciousness is a fundamental substance or factor of reality or morality
Well, that helps explain why most humans mistakenly believe that consciousness is a fundamental substance or factor of reality or morality

Maybe they’ll just grant him his guitly plea…
Maybe they’ll just grant him his guilty plea…

I plod along, putting brick to brick, and wondering if the morter could be better
I plod along, putting brick to brick, and wondering if the mortar could be better

I remember at some point I started thinking how weird it would be to have your biggest acheivements be when you were young
I remember at some point I started thinking how weird it would be to have your biggest achievements be when you were young

I'd say firework because of the sponteneity of your drabbles
I'd say firework because of the spontaneity of your drabbles

I'm more a candl, I think, than anything more illuminating.
I'm more a candle, I think, than anything more illuminating.

ut for now we were all alone, and it was exhilerating.
ut for now we were all alone, and it was exhilarating.

I'm being sent to a cardiologist tommorrow.
I'm being sent to a cardiologist tomorrow.

hat happens to the ammonmia?
hat happens to the ammonia?

The author claims in the afterword to have done us all a hugh favor by bringing this flat and unadorned tale to us - it's Hungarian!
The author claims in the afterword to have done us all a huge favor by bringing this flat and unadorned tale to us - it's Hungarian!

 Unfortunately I have already read THe Agony and Ecstacy and anyone else describing the artistic process is a rank amateur in comparison.
 Unfortunately I have already read THe Agony and Ecstasy and anyone else describing the artistic process is a rank amateur in comparison.

I would recommend it to anyone who likes any of the following: literature, intellegentsia, Pamela Dean, literary fantasy, coming-of-age stories, books with nifty purple covers
I would recommend it to anyone who likes any of the following: literature, intelligentsia, Pamela Dean, literary fantasy, coming-of-age stories, books with nifty purple covers

depravation
deprivation

 I don't mean with a person sitting at a computer with a microphone, but rather inputing a pre-recorded audio file.
 I don't mean with a person sitting at a computer with a microphone, but rather inputting a pre-recorded audio file.

It work's on Seq[Double] (which is fine), but returns Seq[Double], which is bad
It works on Seq[Double] (which is fine), but returns Seq[Double], which is bad

get avarage
get average

Does anyone have suggestionts how to improve those two issues?
Does anyone have suggestions how to improve those two issues?

Acquisation can be very useful (for e.g. security) but it should be explicitly defined where needed.
Acquisition can be very useful (for e.g. security) but it should be explicitly defined where needed.

Then, if the prover returnss a proof, then you can look at x to figure out what that program P evaluated to.
Then, if the prover returns a proof, then you can look at x to figure out what that program P evaluated to.

you can write it using primitive recursion, but the excercise is a lot more intuitive with general recursion.
you can write it using primitive recursion, but the exercise is a lot more intuitive with general recursion.

 It's main editor basically requires that you constantly have one hand on the mouse and hunt and peck keys with the other hand
 Its main editor basically requires that you constantly have one hand on the mouse and hunt and peck keys with the other hand

As a result, I repeatedly wipped a disk
As a result, I repeatedly wiped a disk

His take is that Plan 9 wasnt enough of an advance over Unix to make a compelling switch.
His take is that Plan 9 wasn't enough of an advance over Unix to make a compelling switch.

It is a tiling window manger, so I can just hit a hotkey
It is a tiling window manager, so I can just hit a hotkey

it's even contoured so that you can open your eyes unabstructed which allows for better REM sleep I'm told
it's even contoured so that you can open your eyes unobstructed which allows for better REM sleep I'm told

This mask is nicely padded, very comfortable, and keeps it's shape really well.
This mask is nicely padded, very comfortable, and keeps its shape really well.

There are two very important implications of this that non-practicioners and novices don't always realise
There are two very important implications of this that non-practitioners and novices don't always realise

sadly the people who didn't think of female programmers as equal to male, where the young open-minded friends at the university rather than a bit older people at work
sadly the people who didn't think of female programmers as equal to male, were the young open-minded friends at the university rather than a bit older people at work

It's effected our company for sure.
It's affected our company for sure.

but i assure you there is nothing that qualifies as "clothing" that would not be more modest than spome of what i have seen at conventions...
but i assure you there is nothing that qualifies as "clothing" that would not be more modest than some of what i have seen at conventions...

